Welk document ligt nog thuis?|Which document is still at home?|کدام مدرک هنوز در خانه است؟
Het paspoort.|The passport.|گذرنامه.
De identiteitskaart.|The identity card.|کارت شناسایی.
Dag Nora, met het loket. Uw paspoort ligt nog thuis, maar u kunt het formulier hier al invullen. Breng bij uw volgende bezoek zowel het paspoort als het ontbrekende attest mee. Kunt u die twee documenten klaarleggen?|Hello Nora, this is the service desk. Your passport is still at home, but you can fill in the form here already. Bring both the passport and the missing certificate on your next visit. Can you get those two documents ready?|سلام نورا، از باجه تماس می‌گیرم. گذرنامه‌تان هنوز در خانه است، اما فرم را همین‌جا می‌توانید پر کنید. دفعه بعد هم گذرنامه و هم گواهی کم‌شده را بیاورید. می‌توانید هر دو مدرک را آماده کنید؟
Dank u. Ik vul het formulier nu in en leg thuis mijn paspoort en attest klaar. Wanneer kan ik ze komen brengen?|Thank you. I will fill in the form now and get my passport and certificate ready at home. When can I bring them?|ممنون. الان فرم را پر می‌کنم و در خانه گذرنامه و گواهی را آماده می‌کنم. چه زمانی می‌توانم آن‌ها را بیاورم؟

Welke dag is uiteindelijk juist voor het gesprek?|Which day is eventually correct for the interview?|سرانجام کدام روز برای مصاحبه درست است؟
Vrijdag.|Friday.|جمعه.
Donderdag.|Thursday.|پنجشنبه.
Goedendag Amir. In de uitnodiging stond donderdag, maar het gesprek is op vrijdag. De datum in de bevestiging is juist. Neem uw contract en een kopie van uw diploma mee. Wilt u even laten weten dat u dit bericht ontvangen hebt?|Hello Amir. The invitation said Thursday, but the interview is on Friday. The date in the confirmation is correct. Bring your contract and a copy of your diploma. Please let us know you received this message.|سلام امیر. دعوت‌نامه پنجشنبه را گفته بود، اما مصاحبه جمعه است. تاریخ تأییدیه درست است. قرارداد و کپی مدرکتان را بیاورید. لطفاً خبر بدهید که این پیام را دریافت کرده‌اید.
Ik heb uw bericht ontvangen. Ik kom vrijdag en neem mijn contract en een kopie van mijn diploma mee. Bedankt voor de verduidelijking.|I received your message. I will come on Friday and bring my contract and a copy of my diploma. Thank you for clarifying.|پیامتان را دریافت کردم. جمعه می‌آیم و قرارداد و کپی مدرکم را می‌آورم. ممنون که روشن کردید.

Van wie leent Els een kleinere reisgids?|Who lends Els a smaller guidebook?|الس از چه کسی راهنمای سفر کوچک‌تری قرض می‌گیرد؟
Van haar zus.|Her sister.|از خواهرش.
Van haar vriend.|Her friend.|از دوستش.
Dag Els, je zus hier. Mijn kleine reisgids mag in jouw tas. Je hoeft dus geen extra bagage mee te nemen. Haal het boekje vanavond op en geef het na de reis terug. Past dat voor jou?|Hi Els, your sister here. You can put my small guidebook in your bag. You will not need extra luggage. Pick it up this evening and return it after the trip. Does that suit you?|سلام الس، خواهرت هستم. راهنمای کوچک من را می‌توانی در کیفت بگذاری؛ بار اضافه لازم نیست. امشب کتابچه را بگیر و بعد از سفر برگردان. برایت مناسب است؟
Dat past goed. Ik haal je kleine reisgids vanavond op. Zo kan mijn drinkfles ook in de tas. Na de reis breng ik het boekje terug.|That suits me. I will collect your small guidebook tonight. My water bottle will fit too. I will return the book after the trip.|مناسب است. امشب راهنمای کوچکت را می‌گیرم. این‌طوری بطری آبم هم جا می‌شود. بعد از سفر کتابچه را برمی‌گردانم.

Hoe verandert het weer na de ochtendregen?|How does the weather change after the morning rain?|بعد از باران صبح هوا چطور تغییر می‌کند؟
Het wordt warm en zonnig.|It becomes warm and sunny.|گرم و آفتابی می‌شود.
Het blijft koud en regenachtig.|It stays cold and rainy.|سرد و بارانی می‌ماند.
Hallo Jo, op de camping is de regen voorbij. Het wordt nu warm en zonnig. Gelukkig heb jij zonnecrème ingepakt. Breng ook je handdoek mee om de natte bank te drogen. Dan kunnen we daar samen zitten.|Hello Jo, the rain has stopped at the campsite. It is becoming warm and sunny. Luckily you packed sunscreen. Bring your towel to dry the wet bench too. Then we can sit there together.|سلام یو، باران در محل چادر تمام شده. حالا هوا گرم و آفتابی می‌شود. خوشبختانه ضدآفتاب آورده‌ای. حوله‌ات را هم بیاور تا نیمکت خیس را خشک کنیم؛ بعد با هم آنجا می‌نشینیم.
Ik kom met de handdoek en de zonnecrème. We drogen eerst de bank. Mijn regenjas houd ik toch bij, want het weer kan weer veranderen.|I will bring the towel and sunscreen. We will dry the bench first. I will keep my raincoat with me because the weather could change again.|حوله و ضدآفتاب می‌آورم. اول نیمکت را خشک می‌کنیم. بارانی را همراهم نگه می‌دارم، چون ممکن است هوا دوباره عوض شود.

Hoe legt Lina de laatste kilometer af?|How does Lina cover the last kilometre?|لینا آخرین کیلومتر را چطور می‌رود؟
Met een huurfiets.|On a rental bicycle.|با دوچرخه کرایه‌ای.
Met een taxi.|In a taxi.|با تاکسی.
Dag, Lina hier. Ik heb de bus gemist en de tram rijdt niet meer. De taxi is mij te duur. Ik neem een huurfiets voor de laatste kilometer. Kun je mij zeggen waar ik de fiets bij jullie kan zetten?|Hello, Lina here. I missed the bus and the tram has stopped running. The taxi is too expensive for me. I will take a rental bicycle for the last kilometre. Can you tell me where I can leave it near your place?|سلام، لینا هستم. اتوبوس را از دست دادم و تراموا دیگر کار نمی‌کند. تاکسی برایم خیلی گران است. آخرین کیلومتر را با دوچرخه کرایه‌ای می‌آیم. می‌گویی آن را نزدیک خانه شما کجا بگذارم؟
Goed dat je een huurfiets gevonden hebt. Ik kijk even waar je die mag terugzetten en stuur je het adres. Laat weten wanneer je vertrekt.|Good that you found a rental bicycle. I will check where you may return it and send you the address. Let me know when you leave.|خوب شد دوچرخه کرایه‌ای پیدا کردی. بررسی می‌کنم کجا می‌توانی تحویلش بدهی و نشانی را می‌فرستم. وقتی راه افتادی خبر بده.

Waarom moet de ingang vrijgemaakt worden?|Why must the entrance be cleared?|چرا باید ورودی باز شود؟
Een rolstoelgebruiker kan niet voorbij.|A wheelchair user cannot get past.|فردی با صندلی چرخ‌دار نمی‌تواند رد شود.
Een bestelwagen moet naar binnen rijden.|A van needs to drive inside.|یک ون باید داخل برود.
Dag buur, er staan een bakfiets en een scooter voor de deur van het buurthuis. Een bezoeker met een rolstoel geraakt er niet voorbij. We zoeken de eigenaars. Kun je helpen hen te vinden zodat de ingang vrij wordt?|Hello neighbour, a cargo bike and a scooter are in front of the community centre door. A wheelchair user cannot get past. We are looking for the owners. Can you help find them so the entrance can be cleared?|سلام همسایه، یک دوچرخه باری و اسکوتر جلوی در مرکز محله هستند. بازدیدکننده‌ای با صندلی چرخ‌دار نمی‌تواند رد شود. دنبال صاحبانشان هستیم. کمک می‌کنی پیدا شوند تا ورودی باز شود؟
Natuurlijk. Ik vraag binnen van wie de bakfiets en de scooter zijn. De eigenaars kunnen ze naast de deelwagen zetten, zodat de bezoeker kan passeren.|Of course. I will ask inside who owns the cargo bike and scooter. The owners can put them beside the shared car so the visitor can pass.|حتماً. داخل می‌پرسم دوچرخه باری و اسکوتر برای چه کسی هستند. صاحبان می‌توانند آن‌ها را کنار خودروی اشتراکی بگذارند تا بازدیدکننده رد شود.

Waarom kiest Farid de lift?|Why does Farid choose the lift?|چرا فرید آسانسور را انتخاب می‌کند؟
Hij heeft een zware koffer.|He has a heavy suitcase.|چمدان سنگین دارد.
Hij wil naar de uitgang beneden.|He wants the exit downstairs.|می‌خواهد به خروجی پایین برود.
Hallo, Farid hier. Het loket zegt dat ons perron boven ligt. Ik heb een zware koffer en neem daarom de lift. Loop niet naar de uitgang. Wacht je boven bij de lift op mij?|Hello, Farid here. The ticket desk says our platform is upstairs. I have a heavy suitcase, so I am taking the lift. Do not walk to the exit. Will you wait for me upstairs by the lift?|سلام، فرید هستم. باجه می‌گوید سکوی ما بالاست. چمدان سنگین دارم و برای همین آسانسور می‌گیرم. به سمت خروجی نرو. بالا کنار آسانسور منتظرم می‌مانی؟
Ja, ik wacht boven bij de lift. Ik ga niet naar de uitgang. Daarna zoeken we samen het juiste perron, zodat we dezelfde trein nemen.|Yes, I will wait upstairs by the lift. I will not go to the exit. Then we will find the right platform together and take the same train.|بله، بالا کنار آسانسور منتظر می‌مانم و به خروجی نمی‌روم. بعد با هم سکوی درست را پیدا می‌کنیم تا سوار یک قطار شویم.

Waar ontdekt Lies de wijziging van het spoor?|Where does Lies discover the platform change?|لیس تغییر سکو را کجا می‌فهمد؟
Op het informatiebord in de wachtzaal.|On the information board in the waiting room.|روی تابلوی اطلاعات سالن انتظار.
Op de ticketautomaat buiten.|On the ticket machine outside.|روی دستگاه بلیت بیرون.
Dag, met Lies. Het informatiebord in de wachtzaal toont een ander spoor. Onze trein vertrekt nu aan de andere kant van het station. Ik ga via de trap. Kijk even naar het bord en volg de nieuwe aanduiding.|Hi, Lies speaking. The information board in the waiting room shows a different platform. Our train now leaves from the other side of the station. I am taking the stairs. Check the board and follow the new sign.|سلام، لیس هستم. تابلوی سالن انتظار سکوی دیگری را نشان می‌دهد. قطارمان حالا از طرف دیگر ایستگاه حرکت می‌کند. من از پله می‌روم. تابلو را بررسی کن و علامت تازه را دنبال کن.
Bedankt voor het bericht. Ik controleer het informatiebord en ga naar het nieuwe spoor. Kun je even bij de trap wachten tot ik daar ben?|Thanks for the message. I will check the information board and go to the new platform. Could you wait by the stairs until I arrive?|ممنون که خبر دادی. تابلوی اطلاعات را بررسی می‌کنم و به سکوی تازه می‌روم. می‌توانی کنار پله صبر کنی تا برسم؟

Waarom kiest Tom een eerdere trein?|Why does Tom choose an earlier train?|چرا تام قطار زودتری انتخاب می‌کند؟
Hij wil meer overstaptijd.|He wants more time to change trains.|برای تعویض قطار وقت بیشتری می‌خواهد.
Hij wil zijn afspraak vroeger laten beginnen.|He wants his appointment to start earlier.|می‌خواهد قرارش زودتر شروع شود.
Hoi, Tom hier. Onze route vraagt twee treinen. Met de eerste planning is de overstap erg kort. Ik stel een eerdere eerste trein voor, zodat we meer overstaptijd hebben. De afspraak zelf blijft op hetzelfde uur. Kun je mee?|Hi, Tom here. Our route needs two trains. With the original plan the connection is very short. I suggest an earlier first train so we have more time to change. The appointment itself stays at the same time. Can you join me?|سلام، تام هستم. مسیر به دو قطار نیاز دارد. در برنامه اول زمان تعویض خیلی کم است. قطار اول را زودتر بگیریم تا برای تعویض وقت بیشتری باشد. ساعت خود قرار عوض نمی‌شود. می‌توانی بیایی؟
Dat lijkt me een goed idee. Met meer overstaptijd hoeven we minder te haasten. Stuur je mij de nieuwe vertrektijd? De afspraak zet ik niet vroeger.|That sounds good. More time to change means less rushing. Will you send me the new departure time? I will not move the appointment earlier.|ایده خوبی است. وقت بیشتر برای تعویض یعنی عجله کمتر. ساعت حرکت تازه را می‌فرستی؟ خود قرار را جلو نمی‌اندازم.

Wie verwittigt Sana over haar late aankomst?|Who does Sana notify about her late arrival?|سانا دیر رسیدنش را به چه کسی خبر می‌دهد؟
Het hotel.|The hotel.|هتل.
De taxichauffeur.|The taxi driver.|راننده تاکسی.
Goedenavond, Sana hier. Ik bel het hotel omdat mijn trein vertraging heeft. Ik kom later aan dan bij mijn reservatie staat. Wilt u mijn kamer bewaren en uitleggen hoe ik straks binnen kan komen?|Good evening, Sana speaking. I am calling the hotel because my train is delayed. I will arrive later than my reservation says. Could you keep my room and explain how I can get inside later?|عصر بخیر، سانا هستم. به هتل زنگ می‌زنم چون قطارم تأخیر دارد. دیرتر از زمان رزرو می‌رسم. اتاقم را نگه می‌دارید و توضیح می‌دهید بعداً چطور وارد شوم؟
Dank u om ons te verwittigen. Ik controleer uw reservatie en zoek de instructies voor een late aankomst op. Kunt u eerst uw naam nog eens spellen?|Thank you for notifying us. I will check your reservation and look up the instructions for a late arrival. Could you spell your name first?|ممنون که خبر دادید. رزروتان را بررسی می‌کنم و راهنمای ورود دیرهنگام را پیدا می‌کنم. ابتدا می‌توانید نامتان را هجی کنید؟

Waarvoor spreken de huisgenoten een rustig uur af?|What do the housemates arrange a quiet hour for?|هم‌خانه‌ها برای چه کاری یک ساعت آرام توافق می‌کنند؟
Voor een online examen.|For an online exam.|برای امتحان آنلاین.
Voor een repetitie.|For a rehearsal.|برای تمرین موسیقی.
Hoi allemaal, Noor hier. Mijn online examen duurt één uur. Het geluid uit de gang is in mijn slaapkamer goed te horen. Kunnen we voor dat uur stilte afspreken en de badkamerdeur zacht sluiten? Daarna kunnen jullie weer muziek oefenen.|Hi everyone, Noor here. My online exam lasts one hour. I can clearly hear corridor noise in my bedroom. Could we agree on quiet for that hour and close the bathroom door gently? Afterwards you can practise music again.|سلام به همه، نور هستم. امتحان آنلاینم یک ساعت طول می‌کشد. صدای راهرو را در اتاقم خوب می‌شنوم. می‌شود آن ساعت آرام باشیم و در حمام را آهسته ببندیم؟ بعد می‌توانید دوباره موسیقی تمرین کنید.
We houden het dat uur rustig en sluiten de deuren zacht. Stuur je de begin- en eindtijd? Dan plannen we de repetitie na je examen.|We will keep quiet for that hour and close doors gently. Could you send the start and end times? We will plan the rehearsal after your exam.|آن ساعت آرام می‌مانیم و درها را آهسته می‌بندیم. ساعت شروع و پایان را می‌فرستی؟ تمرین موسیقی را بعد از امتحانت می‌گذاریم.

Waar worden de extra stoelen gevonden?|Where are the extra chairs found?|صندلی‌های اضافه کجا پیدا می‌شوند؟
In de berging achter het terras.|In the storage room behind the terrace.|در انباری پشت تراس.
Op het balkon.|On the balcony.|روی بالکن.
Dag Ben, ik heb de stoelen gevonden. Ze staan in de berging achter het terras, niet op het balkon. We halen ze daar straks voor het etentje. Kun je een briefje op de deur hangen met hun vaste plaats?|Hi Ben, I found the chairs. They are in the storage room behind the terrace, not on the balcony. We will collect them for dinner later. Can you put a note on the door showing their usual place?|سلام بن، صندلی‌ها را پیدا کردم. در انباری پشت تراس‌اند، نه روی بالکن. برای شام از آنجا می‌آوریم. می‌توانی یادداشتی با محل ثابتشان روی در بچسبانی؟
Ja, ik schrijf op het briefje dat de stoelen in de berging achter het terras staan. Na het etentje zet ik ze daar weer terug.|Yes, I will write on the note that the chairs are in the storage room behind the terrace. After dinner I will return them there.|بله، روی یادداشت می‌نویسم صندلی‌ها در انباری پشت تراس‌اند. بعد از شام دوباره همان‌جا می‌گذارمشان.

Wat maakt het moeilijk om de zetel binnen te krijgen?|What makes it difficult to get the sofa inside?|چه چیزی داخل بردن مبل را سخت می‌کند؟
De zetel is te breed voor de deur.|The sofa is too wide for the door.|مبل برای در خیلی پهن است.
De kamer heeft geen plaats voor een tafel.|The room has no space for a table.|اتاق برای میز جا ندارد.
Hallo, Mila hier. De tweedehandszetel is te breed voor de deur. Volgens de handleiding kunnen de poten eraf. Ik wil eerst de doorgang meten en de instructies lezen. Kun je daarna helpen? We gaan niets forceren.|Hello, Mila here. The second-hand sofa is too wide for the door. The instructions say its legs can be removed. I want to measure the doorway and read the instructions first. Can you help afterwards? We will not force anything.|سلام، میلا هستم. مبل دست‌دوم برای در زیادی پهن است. راهنما می‌گوید پایه‌ها باز می‌شوند. اول می‌خواهم ورودی را اندازه بگیرم و راهنما را بخوانم. بعد کمک می‌کنی؟ چیزی را با زور جابه‌جا نمی‌کنیم.
Ik kan helpen nadat we de doorgang en de zetel gemeten hebben. Leg de handleiding klaar. Als het niet veilig lukt, zoeken we een andere oplossing.|I can help after we have measured the doorway and sofa. Have the instructions ready. If it cannot be done safely, we will find another solution.|بعد از اندازه گرفتن در و مبل می‌توانم کمک کنم. راهنما را آماده کن. اگر ایمن نشد، راه دیگری پیدا می‌کنیم.

Waarvoor gebruikt Youssef dezelfde tafel?|What does Youssef use the same table for?|یوسف از یک میز برای چه کارهایی استفاده می‌کند؟
Om te eten en te studeren.|For eating and studying.|برای غذا خوردن و درس خواندن.
Om te slapen en boeken op te bergen.|For sleeping and storing books.|برای خوابیدن و نگهداری کتاب.
Dag, Youssef hier. Mijn kamer is klein, dus ik wil één tafel gebruiken om te eten en te studeren. Voor de boeken zoek ik een smalle kast. Wil je mee naar de winkel? De doorgang moet vrij blijven.|Hello, Youssef here. My room is small, so I want to use one table for eating and studying. I am looking for a narrow bookcase. Will you come to the shop? The passage must stay clear.|سلام، یوسف هستم. اتاقم کوچک است و می‌خواهم یک میز برای غذا و درس داشته باشم. برای کتاب‌ها قفسه باریک می‌خواهم. با من به فروشگاه می‌آیی؟ راه عبور باید باز بماند.
Ik ga mee. Meet vooraf de vrije ruimte, zodat we een passende tafel en smalle kast kiezen. Eén tafel voor eten en studeren bespaart veel plaats.|I will come. Measure the available space first so we can choose a suitable table and narrow bookcase. One table for eating and studying saves space.|می‌آیم. اول فضای آزاد را اندازه بگیر تا میز مناسب و قفسه باریک انتخاب کنیم. یک میز برای غذا و درس خیلی جا صرفه‌جویی می‌کند.

Wat leent Ada van de buurvrouw?|What does Ada borrow from her neighbour?|آدا از همسایه چه چیزی قرض می‌گیرد؟
Een grote kookpot.|A large cooking pot.|قابلمه بزرگ.
Een koekenpan.|A frying pan.|ماهیتابه.
Dag buurvrouw, met Ada. We maken soep voor de buurt, maar ik heb alleen een pan en geen grote kookpot. Mag ik uw kookpot lenen? Ik breng hem na het koken afgewassen terug. Laat u weten of dat kan?|Hello neighbour, Ada speaking. We are making soup for the neighbourhood, but I only have a frying pan and no large pot. May I borrow yours? I will return it washed after cooking. Please let me know if that works.|سلام همسایه، آدا هستم. برای محله سوپ می‌پزیم، اما فقط ماهیتابه دارم و قابلمه بزرگ ندارم. می‌توانم قابلمه‌تان را قرض بگیرم؟ بعد از آشپزی شسته برمی‌گردانم. خبر می‌دهید ممکن است یا نه؟
Je mag mijn grote kookpot lenen. Kom hem gerust halen. Spreken we ook af wanneer je hem terugbrengt? Dan weet ik wanneer ik hem weer kan gebruiken.|You may borrow my large pot. Come and collect it. Shall we also agree when you will return it? Then I know when I can use it again.|می‌توانی قابلمه بزرگم را قرض بگیری. بیا بگیرش. زمان برگرداندن را هم مشخص کنیم؟ آن وقت می‌دانم چه زمانی دوباره می‌توانم استفاده کنم.

Waar ligt het vergiet?|Where is the colander?|آبکش کجاست؟
In de onderste kast achter de kommen.|In the bottom cupboard behind the bowls.|در کمد پایینی پشت کاسه‌ها.
Op de snijplank naast de pasta.|On the chopping board beside the pasta.|روی تخته برش کنار پاستا.
Hoi Lou, het vergiet ligt in de onderste kast, achter de kommen. Daarom kon je het niet zien. Zet het na het koken liever vooraan, want we gebruiken het vaak. Kun je ook aan de anderen vertellen waar het nu staat?|Hi Lou, the colander is in the bottom cupboard behind the bowls. That is why you could not see it. After cooking put it at the front because we use it often. Could you also tell the others where it is now?|سلام لو، آبکش در کمد پایینی پشت کاسه‌هاست. برای همین نمی‌دیدی. بعد از آشپزی جلوی کمد بگذار، چون زیاد استفاده می‌کنیم. به بقیه هم می‌گویی حالا کجاست؟
Ik heb het vergiet gevonden. Na het koken zet ik het vooraan in dezelfde kast. Ik laat de anderen weten dat het daar gemakkelijk bereikbaar is.|I found the colander. After cooking I will put it at the front of the same cupboard. I will tell the others it is easy to reach there.|آبکش را پیدا کردم. بعد از آشپزی جلوی همان کمد می‌گذارم. به بقیه می‌گویم که آنجا به‌راحتی در دسترس است.

Waar proeven de vrienden eerst de gember?|Where do the friends first taste the ginger?|دوستان اول زنجبیل را در چه چیزی می‌چشند؟
In een klein kommetje soep.|In a small bowl of soup.|در کاسه کوچکی سوپ.
In de hele kookpot tegelijk.|In the entire cooking pot at once.|یکباره در کل قابلمه.
Dag Sam, voeg de gember nog niet aan de hele pot toe. We proberen eerst een klein kommetje soep met gember. Als iedereen die smaak lekker vindt, doen we een beetje in de grote pot. Wil jij de proefportie maken?|Hi Sam, do not add ginger to the whole pot yet. We will first try a small bowl of soup with ginger. If everyone likes the taste, we will add a little to the large pot. Will you make the test portion?|سلام سم، هنوز زنجبیل را به کل قابلمه اضافه نکن. اول کاسه کوچکی سوپ با زنجبیل امتحان می‌کنیم. اگر همه طعمش را دوست داشتند، کمی به قابلمه بزرگ اضافه می‌کنیم. تو نمونه را درست می‌کنی؟
Ja, ik maak eerst een kleine proefportie. We proeven samen voordat ik de grote pot verander. Zo kan iedereen zeggen of de hoeveelheid gember goed is.|Yes, I will make a small test portion first. We will taste it together before I change the large pot. Everyone can say whether the amount of ginger is right.|بله، اول نمونه کوچکی درست می‌کنم. قبل از تغییر قابلمه بزرگ با هم می‌چشیم تا همه بگویند مقدار زنجبیل مناسب است یا نه.

Waarom zet Noor de kruiden apart?|Why does Noor serve the herbs separately?|چرا نور سبزی‌ها را جدا می‌گذارد؟
Een gast houdt niet van koriander.|A guest does not like coriander.|یکی از مهمانان گشنیز دوست ندارد.
De salade bevat nog geen olijfolie.|The salad has no olive oil yet.|سالاد هنوز روغن زیتون ندارد.
Hallo, met Noor. Een gast heeft gezegd dat hij koriander niet lust. Daarom meng ik die niet door de hele salade. De kruiden komen apart op tafel. Wil jij de gasten vertellen dat ze zelf mogen kiezen?|Hello, Noor speaking. A guest said he does not like coriander. I will therefore not mix it through the whole salad. The herbs will be separate on the table. Could you tell the guests they can choose for themselves?|سلام، نور هستم. مهمانی گفته گشنیز دوست ندارد. برای همین آن را در کل سالاد مخلوط نمی‌کنم. سبزی‌ها جدا روی میز می‌آیند. به مهمان‌ها می‌گویی خودشان انتخاب کنند؟
Ik vertel het aan de gasten. Ze kunnen koriander toevoegen als ze dat willen. Goed dat de salade zonder koriander blijft, zodat iedereen zelf kan kiezen.|I will tell the guests. They can add coriander if they want. It is good that the salad stays without coriander so everyone can choose.|به مهمان‌ها می‌گویم. اگر خواستند گشنیز اضافه کنند. خوب است سالاد بدون گشنیز می‌ماند تا هرکس خودش انتخاب کند.

Welke informatie noteert Eva bij elke klacht?|What information does Eva note for each symptom?|اوا کنار هر مشکل چه اطلاعاتی یادداشت می‌کند؟
Wanneer de klacht begon.|When it began.|زمان شروع آن.
Welke diagnose haar vriend vermoedt.|Which diagnosis her friend suspects.|بیماری‌ای که دوستش حدس می‌زند.
Dag, Eva hier. Voor mijn afspraak schrijf ik mijn klachten op, met de dag waarop elke klacht begon. Anders vergeet ik tijdens het gesprek veel. Wil je met mij controleren of mijn briefje duidelijk is? Je hoeft geen diagnose te geven.|Hello, Eva here. Before my appointment I am writing down my symptoms and the day each started. Otherwise I forget a lot during the conversation. Will you check whether my note is clear? You do not need to give a diagnosis.|سلام، اوا هستم. پیش از قرارم نشانه‌ها و روز شروع هرکدام را می‌نویسم، وگرنه موقع صحبت خیلی چیزها یادم می‌رود. بررسی می‌کنی یادداشتم روشن باشد؟ لازم نیست بیماری را تشخیص بدهی.
Ik lees graag je briefje. We controleren of de klachten en de begintijden duidelijk zijn. De medische vragen bewaar je voor de arts tijdens je afspraak.|I will read your note. We will check that the symptoms and starting times are clear. Keep the medical questions for the doctor at your appointment.|با میل یادداشتت را می‌خوانم. بررسی می‌کنیم نشانه‌ها و زمان شروع روشن باشند. سؤال‌های پزشکی را برای پزشک موقع ملاقات نگه دار.

Welke twee woorden verwarren de cursisten?|Which two words do the learners confuse?|زبان‌آموزان کدام دو واژه را اشتباه می‌گیرند؟
Vermoeidheid en jeuk.|Tiredness and itching.|خستگی و خارش.
Hoest en keelpijn.|Cough and sore throat.|سرفه و گلودرد.
Hoi taalpartner, ik haal vermoeidheid en jeuk nog door elkaar. Kunnen we beide betekenissen tekenen en elkaar vragen stellen? Daarna oefenen we een kort gesprek bij de dokter. Het gaat om de juiste woorden, niet om zelf een ziekte te raden.|Hi language partner, I still confuse tiredness and itching. Could we draw both meanings and ask each other questions? Then we can practise a short conversation at the doctor's. It is about the right words, not guessing a disease.|سلام همراه زبانی، هنوز خستگی و خارش را قاطی می‌کنم. می‌شود معنی هر دو را بکشیم و از هم سؤال کنیم؟ بعد گفت‌وگوی کوتاه پیش پزشک تمرین کنیم. هدف واژه درست است، نه حدس بیماری.
Goed idee. We vergelijken eerst de tekeningen van vermoeidheid en jeuk. Daarna stel ik een controlevraag, zodat je kunt uitleggen welk woord je bedoelt.|Good idea. We will compare the drawings of tiredness and itching first. Then I will ask a checking question so you can explain which word you mean.|ایده خوبی است. اول تصویر خستگی و خارش را مقایسه می‌کنیم. بعد سؤال بررسی می‌پرسم تا توضیح بدهی منظورت کدام واژه است.

Naar wie vraagt Bilal per ongeluk?|Whom does Bilal ask for by mistake?|بلال اشتباهی چه کسی را می‌خواهد؟
De tandarts.|The dentist.|دندان‌پزشک.
De oogarts.|The eye doctor.|چشم‌پزشک.
Goedendag, Bilal hier. Ik zei net tandarts, maar ik bedoelde huisarts. Sorry voor de verwarring. Kunt u controleren bij wie mijn afspraak staat en mij de juiste naam herhalen?|Hello, Bilal speaking. I just said dentist, but I meant family doctor. Sorry for the confusion. Could you check whom my appointment is with and repeat the correct name?|سلام، بلال هستم. الان گفتم دندان‌پزشک، اما منظورم پزشک عمومی بود. ببخشید که اشتباه شد. بررسی می‌کنید قرارم با چه کسی است و نام درست را تکرار می‌کنید؟
Geen probleem. Ik zoek uw afspraak op voordat we iets veranderen. Daarna herhaal ik de naam van de zorgverlener, zodat u de bevestiging kunt controleren.|No problem. I will look up your appointment before we change anything. Then I will repeat the professional's name so you can check the confirmation.|اشکالی ندارد. پیش از تغییر چیزی، قرارتان را پیدا می‌کنم. بعد نام متخصص را تکرار می‌کنم تا تأییدیه را بررسی کنید.

Wat noteert het gezin bij elke afspraak?|What does the family write down for each appointment?|خانواده برای هر ملاقات چه می‌نویسد؟
De naam en het adres.|The name and address.|نام و نشانی.
Alleen de naam van de arts.|Only the doctor's name.|فقط نام پزشک.
Dag, met de maatschappelijk werker. Zet bij elke afspraak zowel de naam als het adres in uw agenda. Dan hebt u één overzicht. Wilt u zelf de volgorde controleren en zeggen waar nog informatie ontbreekt?|Hello, this is the social worker. Put both the name and address for every appointment in your calendar. Then you have one overview. Could you check the order yourselves and say where information is missing?|سلام، مددکار اجتماعی هستم. برای هر ملاقات نام و نشانی را در تقویم بنویسید تا یک جدول داشته باشید. خودتان ترتیب را بررسی می‌کنید و می‌گویید کجا اطلاعات کم است؟
We zetten de namen en adressen bij elkaar. Daarna controleren we de volgorde als gezin. Als een adres ontbreekt, vragen we dat na voordat we vertrekken.|We will put the names and addresses together. Then we will check the order as a family. If an address is missing, we will ask before leaving.|نام‌ها و نشانی‌ها را کنار هم می‌گذاریم و خانوادگی ترتیب را بررسی می‌کنیم. اگر نشانی کم باشد، پیش از حرکت می‌پرسیم.

Wat doet Jan wanneer hij de lichaamsdelen door elkaar haalt?|What does Jan do when he confuses the body parts?|یان هنگام اشتباه گرفتن اندام‌ها چه می‌کند؟
Hij wijst naar zijn been.|He points to his leg.|به پایش اشاره می‌کند.
Hij wijst naar zijn hoofd.|He points to his head.|به سرش اشاره می‌کند.
Hoi Jan, op de tekening wees je naar je been terwijl je arm zei. Laten we samen arm, knie en enkel aanwijzen. Zeg ook links of rechts. Zo wordt je beschrijving in een oefengesprek duidelijker.|Hi Jan, you pointed to your leg in the picture while saying arm. Let us point to arm, knee and ankle together. Say left or right too. That will make your practice description clearer.|سلام یان، روی تصویر به پا اشاره کردی ولی گفتی بازو. با هم بازو، زانو و مچ پا را نشان بدهیم. چپ یا راست را هم بگو تا توضیحت در تمرین روشن‌تر شود.
Graag. Ik wees naar mijn been, maar gebruikte het verkeerde woord. Ik kijk nu goed naar de tekening en noem telkens het lichaamsdeel en de juiste kant.|Gladly. I pointed to my leg but used the wrong word. I will look carefully at the picture and name the body part and the correct side each time.|با میل. به پا اشاره کردم ولی واژه اشتباه گفتم. حالا تصویر را دقیق نگاه می‌کنم و هر بار اندام و سمت درست را می‌گویم.

Waarom maakt Lina een grotere tekening?|Why does Lina make a larger drawing?|چرا لینا تصویر بزرگ‌تری می‌کشد؟
Niet alle woorden passen bij de kleine tekening.|Not all the words fit beside the small drawing.|همه واژه‌ها کنار تصویر کوچک جا نمی‌شوند.
De groep wil een andere taal gebruiken.|The group wants to use another language.|گروه می‌خواهد زبان دیگری به کار ببرد.
Hallo Lina, bij de kleine tekening passen niet alle woorden voor lichaamsdelen. Maak je een grotere versie met lijnen naar de juiste plaatsen? Dan kan je oefenpartner alle woorden duidelijk bij de afbeelding plaatsen.|Hello Lina, not all the body-part words fit beside the small drawing. Could you make a larger version with lines to the right places? Then your partner can clearly connect every word to the picture.|سلام لینا، همه واژه‌های اندام کنار تصویر کوچک جا نمی‌شوند. نسخه بزرگ‌تری با خط به محل درست می‌کشی؟ آن وقت همراهت می‌تواند هر واژه را روشن به تصویر وصل کند.
Ik breng een grotere afbeelding mee. We kijken eerst of iedereen de details kan zien. Daarna wijzen we de lichaamsdelen aan en vergelijken we onze antwoorden.|I will bring a larger picture. We will first check that everyone can see the details. Then we will point to the body parts and compare answers.|تصویر بزرگ‌تری می‌آورم. اول بررسی می‌کنیم همه جزئیات را ببینند. بعد اندام‌ها را نشان می‌دهیم و پاسخ‌ها را مقایسه می‌کنیم.

Wat vergelijkt de groep bij verschillende beroepen?|What does the group compare across different jobs?|گروه درباره شغل‌های مختلف چه چیزی را مقایسه می‌کند؟
De werktijden.|Working hours.|ساعت‌های کار.
De reisbestemmingen.|Travel destinations.|مقصدهای سفر.
Dag allemaal, voor ons gesprek over beroepen verzamelen we verschillende werktijden. Niet elke job begint om negen uur. Vraag je gesprekspartner wanneer de werkdag begint en eindigt. Vergelijk daarna de tijden zonder te raden op basis van de jobtitel.|Hello everyone, for our discussion of jobs we are collecting different working hours. Not every job starts at nine. Ask your partner when the working day starts and ends. Then compare the times without guessing from the job title.|سلام به همه، برای گفت‌وگوی شغل‌ها ساعت‌های کار مختلف جمع می‌کنیم. هر شغلی ساعت نه شروع نمی‌شود. از همراهت زمان شروع و پایان را بپرس. بعد بدون حدس از عنوان شغل، زمان‌ها را مقایسه کن.
Ik vraag naar het begin en het einde van de werkdag. Daarna kan ik vergelijken wie vroeger begint. Alleen de naam van het beroep geeft niet genoeg informatie.|I will ask when the working day starts and ends. Then I can compare who starts earlier. The job name alone is not enough information.|زمان شروع و پایان روز کاری را می‌پرسم. بعد می‌توانم مقایسه کنم چه کسی زودتر شروع می‌کند. نام شغل به‌تنهایی اطلاعات کافی نمی‌دهد.

Wat wil de groep benutten bij de taakverdeling?|What does the group want to use when dividing tasks?|گروه در تقسیم کار می‌خواهد از چه استفاده کند؟
De verschillende vaardigheden.|Different skills.|مهارت‌های متفاوت.
Alleen de leeftijd van de deelnemers.|Only participants' ages.|فقط سن شرکت‌کنندگان.
Hoi, voor de buurtactiviteit zoeken we niet alleen mensen die goed kunnen spreken. Iemand kan tekenen en iemand anders kan materiaal herstellen. Vertel wat jij graag doet, zodat we taken verdelen volgens onze vaardigheden.|Hi, for the neighbourhood activity we are not only looking for good speakers. Someone can draw and someone else can repair equipment. Tell us what you enjoy so we can divide tasks according to our skills.|سلام، برای فعالیت محله فقط دنبال سخنران خوب نیستیم. کسی نقاشی می‌کند و دیگری وسایل را تعمیر می‌کند. بگو چه کاری دوست داری تا کارها را بر اساس مهارت‌ها تقسیم کنیم.
Ik teken graag en kan de wegwijzers maken. Voor herstellingen vraag ik liever hulp aan iemand met ervaring. Zo gebruikt iedereen een vaardigheid die bij de taak past.|I enjoy drawing and can make the signs. For repairs I would rather ask someone experienced. Everyone can then use a skill suited to the task.|نقاشی دوست دارم و می‌توانم تابلوها را درست کنم. برای تعمیر از فرد باتجربه کمک می‌خواهم. این‌طوری هرکس مهارت مناسب کار را به کار می‌برد.

Wat doet Amir voordat hij onbekend materiaal gebruikt?|What does Amir do before using unfamiliar equipment?|امیر پیش از استفاده از وسایل ناآشنا چه می‌کند؟
Hij vraagt uitleg.|He asks for instructions.|توضیح می‌خواهد.
Hij probeert alles alleen uit.|He tries everything alone.|همه‌چیز را تنها امتحان می‌کند.
Dag collega, Amir hier. Ik ken deze veiligheidsgordel nog niet. Voor ik iets gebruik, wil ik de instructies begrijpen. Kunt u uitleg geven en aangeven welke taken ik voorlopig niet alleen mag doen?|Hello colleague, Amir here. I do not know this safety belt yet. Before using anything I want to understand the instructions. Could you explain and indicate which tasks I may not do alone for now?|سلام همکار، امیر هستم. این کمربند ایمنی را هنوز نمی‌شناسم. پیش از استفاده می‌خواهم دستورها را بفهمم. توضیح می‌دهید و می‌گویید فعلاً کدام کارها را نباید تنها انجام دهم؟
Ik vraag de begeleider om uitleg te geven. Gebruik het materiaal nog niet tot je de instructies begrijpt. We bekijken ook samen welke taken begeleiding nodig hebben.|I will ask the supervisor to explain. Do not use the equipment until you understand the instructions. We will also check which tasks need supervision.|از سرپرست می‌خواهم توضیح بدهد. تا دستورها را نفهمیدی از وسیله استفاده نکن. با هم بررسی می‌کنیم کدام کارها به همراهی نیاز دارند.

Wat moeten deelnemers tijdens de veiligheidsronde doen?|What must participants do during the safety tour?|شرکت‌کنندگان در بازدید ایمنی باید چه کنند؟
Plaatsen aanwijzen en instructies terugvinden.|Point to locations and find instructions.|محل‌ها را نشان دهند و راهنما را پیدا کنند.
De brandblusser zelf uitproberen.|Try using the extinguisher themselves.|خودشان کپسول را امتحان کنند.
Goedemorgen ploeg. Tijdens deze oefening gebruiken we geen brandblusser of noodknop. We wijzen alleen aan waar ze zijn en waar de lokale instructies staan. Meld het als je een aanduiding niet begrijpt.|Good morning team. During this exercise we do not use the extinguisher or emergency stop. We only point out where they are and where the local instructions are. Say if you do not understand a sign.|صبح بخیر گروه. در این تمرین از کپسول یا دکمه اضطراری استفاده نمی‌کنیم. فقط محل آن‌ها و دستورهای محلی را نشان می‌دهیم. اگر علامتی را نمی‌فهمید، بگویید.
Ik wijs de plaatsen aan zonder iets te bedienen. Bij een onduidelijke aanduiding vraag ik uitleg. Kunt u daarna controleren of ik de juiste instructie gevonden heb?|I will point to the locations without operating anything. I will ask about unclear signs. Could you then check that I found the right instructions?|محل‌ها را بدون استفاده از وسیله نشان می‌دهم. درباره علامت نامفهوم توضیح می‌خواهم. بعد بررسی می‌کنید راهنمای درست را پیدا کرده باشم؟

Welke hulp vraagt Rana aan de leerkracht?|What help does Rana ask the teacher for?|رانا چه کمکی از معلم می‌خواهد؟
Eén concreet voorbeeld.|One concrete example.|یک مثال مشخص.
Een volledige vertaling van het woordenboek.|A full translation of the dictionary.|ترجمه کامل واژه‌نامه.
Dag mevrouw, Rana hier. Ik begrijp het schema op het werkblad nog niet. Het woordenboek helpt niet. Kunt u één concreet voorbeeld tonen? Daarna wil ik zelf een tweede voorbeeld proberen om te zien of ik het begrepen heb.|Hello teacher, Rana here. I still do not understand the worksheet diagram. The dictionary is not helping. Could you show one concrete example? Then I want to try a second myself to check my understanding.|سلام معلم، رانا هستم. نمودار برگه تمرین را هنوز نمی‌فهمم. واژه‌نامه کمک نمی‌کند. یک مثال مشخص نشان می‌دهید؟ بعد می‌خواهم دومی را خودم امتحان کنم تا فهمم را بررسی کنم.
We bekijken samen één concreet voorbeeld. Daarna maak jij een tweede en leg je uit hoe het bij het schema past. Zo zie ik welk deel nog moeilijk is.|We will look at one concrete example together. Then you will make a second and explain how it fits the diagram. I can then see what is still difficult.|یک مثال مشخص را با هم بررسی می‌کنیم. بعد دومی را خودت می‌سازی و توضیح می‌دهی چطور به نمودار مربوط است. این‌طور می‌فهمم چه بخشی هنوز سخت است.

Hoeveel belangrijke stappen kiest Pieter eerst?|How many main steps does Pieter choose first?|پیتر اول چند مرحله اصلی انتخاب می‌کند؟
Drie.|Three.|سه.
Tien.|Ten.|ده.
Hoi Pieter, kies eerst de drie belangrijkste stappen uit de presentatie. Schrijf niet alles over. Probeer daarna de oefening en beluister alleen het deel dat onduidelijk blijft. Laat weten bij welke stap je vastloopt.|Hi Pieter, choose the three main steps from the presentation first. Do not copy everything. Then try the exercise and replay only the unclear part. Tell me which step causes difficulty.|سلام پیتر، اول سه مرحله اصلی ارائه را انتخاب کن. همه‌چیز را رونویسی نکن. بعد تمرین را انجام بده و فقط بخش نامفهوم را دوباره بشنو. بگو در کدام مرحله گیر می‌کنی.
Ik noteer de drie belangrijkste stappen en probeer de oefening. Als één stap moeilijk blijft, luister ik dat deel opnieuw. Daarna kan ik een gerichte vraag stellen.|I will note the three main steps and try the exercise. If one step remains difficult, I will replay that part. Then I can ask a focused question.|سه مرحله اصلی را یادداشت می‌کنم و تمرین را امتحان می‌کنم. اگر مرحله‌ای سخت ماند، همان قسمت را دوباره می‌شنوم و سؤال دقیق می‌پرسم.

Wat weet de groep na de eerste vertaling nog niet?|What does the group still not know after the first translation?|گروه بعد از ترجمه اول هنوز چه نمی‌داند؟
Welke actie de afzender vraagt.|What action the sender wants.|فرستنده چه کاری می‌خواهد.
In welke taal de brief geschreven is.|Which language the letter is written in.|نامه به چه زبانی است.
Hallo leesgroep, we hebben de brief vertaald, maar weten nog niet wat de afzender van ons vraagt. Zoek samen de zin met de gevraagde actie. Bespreek daarna in eigen woorden wat we moeten doen.|Hello reading group, we translated the letter but still do not know what the sender wants us to do. Find the sentence with the requested action together. Then discuss in your own words what we need to do.|سلام گروه مطالعه، نامه را ترجمه کردیم، اما هنوز نمی‌دانیم فرستنده چه کاری از ما می‌خواهد. جمله مربوط به اقدام را با هم پیدا کنید. بعد با زبان خودتان بگویید چه باید کرد.
Laten we de bedoeling eerst bespreken. Ik zoek de zin waarin de afzender iets vraagt en vat die kort samen. Een vertaling alleen maakt de gevraagde actie niet altijd duidelijk.|Let us discuss the purpose first. I will find the sentence where the sender asks for something and summarise it. A translation alone does not always clarify the action.|اول هدف را بررسی کنیم. جمله‌ای را که فرستنده درخواست می‌کند پیدا و کوتاه خلاصه می‌کنم. ترجمه به‌تنهایی همیشه اقدام خواسته‌شده را روشن نمی‌کند.

Waarom herschrijft Mina de korte versie?|Why does Mina rewrite the short version?|چرا مینا نسخه کوتاه را بازنویسی می‌کند؟
Die klinkt te direct.|It sounds too direct.|خیلی مستقیم به گوش می‌رسد.
Die bevat een verkeerd telefoonnummer.|It has the wrong phone number.|شماره تلفن اشتباه دارد.
Hoi, Mina hier. Mijn korte verzoek klinkt hard wanneer ik het hoor. Wil je beide versies voorlezen? Ik wil een beleefde inleiding toevoegen, zonder mijn vraag onduidelijk te maken. Zeg welke versie vriendelijker klinkt.|Hi, Mina here. My short request sounds harsh when I hear it. Could you read both versions aloud? I want to add a polite introduction without making the question unclear. Say which version sounds friendlier.|سلام، مینا هستم. درخواست کوتاهم وقتی می‌شنوم تند است. هر دو نسخه را بلند می‌خوانی؟ می‌خواهم مقدمه مؤدبانه اضافه کنم بدون مبهم شدن سؤال. بگو کدام دوستانه‌تر است.
Ik lees beide versies rustig voor. Daarna vergelijken we de toon. Een korte beleefde inleiding kan helpen, zolang de ontvanger nog duidelijk weet wat je vraagt.|I will read both versions calmly. Then we will compare the tone. A brief polite introduction can help as long as the recipient knows what you are asking.|هر دو نسخه را آرام بلند می‌خوانم و لحن را مقایسه می‌کنیم. مقدمه کوتاه مؤدبانه کمک می‌کند، اگر گیرنده هنوز درخواست را روشن بفهمد.

Welke informatie is fout in de uitnodigingsbrief?|What information is wrong in the invitation letter?|کدام اطلاعات دعوت‌نامه اشتباه است؟
De zaal.|The hall.|سالن.
De naam van Joris.|Joris's name.|نام یوریس.
Dag allemaal, Joris hier. De uitnodigingsbrief noemt helaas de verkeerde zaal. Ik stuur één correctiebericht met de juiste plaats. Gebruik daarna alleen die nieuwe informatie. Willen jullie ook de mensen verwittigen die de brief al gelezen hebben?|Hello everyone, Joris here. The invitation letter unfortunately names the wrong hall. I will send one correction with the right place. Use only the new information afterwards. Could you also notify those who already read the letter?|سلام به همه، یوریس هستم. متأسفانه دعوت‌نامه سالن اشتباه را گفته. پیام اصلاحی با مکان درست می‌فرستم؛ بعد فقط اطلاعات تازه را استفاده کنید. به کسانی که نامه را خوانده‌اند هم خبر می‌دهید؟
Ik geef de correctie door en zeg dat de oude zaal niet meer klopt. Stuur je de juiste plaats nog eens duidelijk? Dan voorkom ik dat ik zelf verkeerde informatie verspreid.|I will pass on the correction and say the old hall is wrong. Please send the correct location clearly once more so I do not spread wrong information myself.|اصلاحیه را منتقل می‌کنم و می‌گویم سالن قبلی درست نیست. مکان درست را یک بار روشن می‌فرستی تا خودم اطلاعات اشتباه پخش نکنم؟

Waarom moet Sara het bestand opnieuw versturen?|Why must Sara resend the file?|چرا سارا باید فایل را دوباره بفرستد؟
De eerste bijlage is leeg.|The first attachment is empty.|پیوست اول خالی است.
Het team wil een andere taal.|The team wants another language.|گروه زبان دیگری می‌خواهد.
Hallo team, Sara hier. Jullie hadden gelijk: mijn eerste bijlage was leeg. Ik heb nu de juiste versie geopend en gecontroleerd. Die stuur ik opnieuw. Kunnen jullie even bevestigen dat het verslag nu leesbaar is?|Hello team, Sara here. You were right: my first attachment was empty. I have now opened and checked the correct version and am resending it. Could you confirm the report is readable now?|سلام گروه، سارا هستم. درست گفتید: پیوست اول خالی بود. حالا نسخه درست را باز و بررسی کردم و دوباره می‌فرستم. تأیید می‌کنید گزارش این بار خواندنی است؟
Bedankt voor de nieuwe versie. Ik open de bijlage en controleer of de pagina's leesbaar zijn. Daarna bevestig ik of het verslag volledig is aangekomen.|Thanks for the new version. I will open the attachment and check whether the pages are readable. Then I will confirm whether the full report arrived.|ممنون برای نسخه تازه. پیوست را باز می‌کنم و خوانا بودن صفحه‌ها را می‌سنجم. بعد خبر می‌دهم گزارش کامل رسیده یا نه.

Wanneer houdt de groep uiteindelijk online overleg?|When does the group finally meet online?|گروه سرانجام چه روزی آنلاین جلسه دارد؟
Woensdag.|Wednesday.|چهارشنبه.
Dinsdag.|Tuesday.|سه‌شنبه.
Dag team, dinsdag lukt niet voor iedereen. We houden daarom woensdag een kort online overleg. De deadline blijft vrijdag. Bevestig tijdens het overleg welke taak jij vóór vrijdag afwerkt, zodat onze planning duidelijk is.|Hello team, Tuesday does not suit everyone. We will therefore hold a short online meeting on Wednesday. The deadline remains Friday. Confirm during the meeting which task you will finish before Friday so our plan is clear.|سلام گروه، سه‌شنبه برای همه ممکن نیست؛ چهارشنبه جلسه آنلاین کوتاه داریم. مهلت همچنان جمعه است. در جلسه تأیید کنید کدام کار را پیش از جمعه تمام می‌کنید تا برنامه روشن باشد.
Woensdag online past voor mij. Ik kijk vooraf welke taak ik tegen vrijdag kan afwerken en bevestig die tijdens het overleg. De gewijzigde vergaderdag verandert de deadline dus niet.|Wednesday online suits me. I will check which task I can finish by Friday and confirm it in the meeting. Changing the meeting day therefore does not change the deadline.|جلسه آنلاین چهارشنبه برایم مناسب است. پیشاپیش بررسی می‌کنم چه کاری تا جمعه انجام می‌دهم و در جلسه تأیید می‌کنم. پس روز جلسه عوض شده، نه مهلت.

Wat kiest de groep wanneer de zaal niet vrij is?|What does the group choose when the room is unavailable?|وقتی سالن آزاد نیست، گروه چه انتخاب می‌کند؟
Een wandeling met kleine gespreksgroepjes.|A walk in small conversation groups.|پیاده‌روی با گروه‌های کوچک گفت‌وگو.
Een nieuwe bijeenkomst in dezelfde gesloten zaal.|A new meeting in the same closed room.|جلسه تازه در همان سالن بسته.
Beste deelnemers, de zaal is niet beschikbaar. We maken in plaats daarvan een wandeling in kleine gespreksgroepjes. Wacht dus niet aan de gesloten zaal. Lees onze nieuwe instructies en laat weten of de verzamelplaats duidelijk is.|Dear participants, the room is unavailable. Instead we will walk in small conversation groups. Do not wait at the closed room. Read the new instructions and tell us whether the meeting place is clear.|شرکت‌کنندگان عزیز، سالن در دسترس نیست. به‌جایش در گروه‌های کوچک گفت‌وگو پیاده‌روی می‌کنیم. جلوی سالن بسته منتظر نمانید. راهنمای تازه را بخوانید و بگویید محل جمع شدن روشن است یا نه.
Ik heb de wijziging gezien en wacht niet bij de zaal. De wandeling lijkt me goed. Kunt u de verzamelplaats nog even herhalen voordat ik vertrek?|I saw the change and will not wait at the hall. The walk sounds good. Could you repeat the meeting place before I leave?|تغییر را دیدم و کنار سالن منتظر نمی‌مانم. پیاده‌روی خوب است. پیش از حرکت، محل جمع شدن را دوباره می‌گویید؟

Wat moeten reizigers doen voordat ze instappen?|What must passengers do before boarding?|مسافران پیش از سوار شدن چه باید کنند؟
Andere reizigers laten uitstappen.|Let other passengers get off.|اجازه دهند دیگران پیاده شوند.
Meteen voor de deur gaan staan.|Stand immediately in front of the door.|فوراً جلوی در بایستند.
Beste reizigers, laat eerst iedereen uitstappen. Er staat nog een auto waar de bus moet stoppen. De bestuurder verplaatst die. Wacht tot de doorgang vrij is en stap dan rustig in.|Dear passengers, let everyone get off first. A car is still where the bus needs to stop. Its driver is moving it. Wait until the passage is clear, then board calmly.|مسافران عزیز، اول بگذارید همه پیاده شوند. هنوز خودرویی در محل توقف اتوبوس است و راننده جابه‌جایش می‌کند. صبر کنید مسیر باز شود، بعد آرام سوار شوید.
We wachten tot de auto weg is en de andere reizigers uitgestapt zijn. Daarna stappen we rustig in. Zo blijft de deur bereikbaar voor iedereen.|We will wait until the car is gone and the other passengers have got off. Then we will board calmly so the door stays accessible for everyone.|صبر می‌کنیم خودرو برود و مسافران دیگر پیاده شوند. بعد آرام سوار می‌شویم تا در برای همه قابل‌دسترسی بماند.

Wanneer kiest de begeleider de nieuwe route?|When does the leader choose the new route?|راهنما چه زمانی مسیر تازه را انتخاب می‌کند؟
Wanneer de groep compleet is.|When the whole group is together.|وقتی همه گروه جمع شده‌اند.
Terwijl enkele deelnemers nog achterblijven.|While some participants are still behind.|وقتی چند نفر هنوز عقب مانده‌اند.
Hallo wandelgroep, het pad is afgesloten. We keren om en verzamelen aan de overkant. Ik kies pas een nieuwe route wanneer iedereen er is. Laat het weten als je iemand mist; loop nog niet alleen verder.|Hello walkers, the path is closed. We will turn back and gather on the other side. I will choose a new route only when everyone is here. Say if someone is missing; do not continue alone yet.|سلام گروه پیاده‌روی، راه بسته است. برمی‌گردیم و آن طرف جمع می‌شویم. فقط وقتی همه باشند مسیر تازه انتخاب می‌کنم. اگر کسی نیست بگویید؛ هنوز تنها جلو نروید.
Ik wacht op de verzamelplaats en kijk of mijn wandelpartner er is. We gaan pas verder wanneer de groep compleet is en de nieuwe route uitgelegd is.|I will wait at the meeting point and check that my walking partner is there. We will continue only when everyone is together and the new route is explained.|در محل جمع شدن صبر می‌کنم و می‌بینم همراهم هست یا نه. وقتی گروه کامل شد و مسیر تازه توضیح داده شد ادامه می‌دهیم.

Waar gaat de collega mensen informeren?|Where does the colleague go to inform people?|همکار برای اطلاع دادن به کجا می‌رود؟
Naar de oude ingang.|To the old entrance.|به ورودی قبلی.
Naar het station buiten de buurt.|To the station outside the neighbourhood.|به ایستگاه بیرون محله.
Dag collega, we zijn vergeten de nieuwe ingang door te geven. Ik ga nu aan de oude ingang staan om mensen te helpen. Kun jij iedereen een bericht sturen met de wijziging? Zo mist niemand de activiteit.|Hello colleague, we forgot to announce the new entrance. I will stand at the old entrance to help people. Can you message everyone about the change? That way nobody misses the activity.|سلام همکار، فراموش کردیم ورودی تازه را اطلاع بدهیم. من جلوی ورودی قدیم می‌ایستم تا کمک کنم. تو تغییر را به همه پیام می‌دهی؟ این‌طور کسی فعالیت را از دست نمی‌دهد.
Ik stuur meteen een bericht met de nieuwe ingang. Goed dat jij bij de oude ingang helpt. Bij een volgende wijziging spreken we vooraf af wie iedereen verwittigt.|I will send a message with the new entrance immediately. It is good that you are helping at the old one. Next time we will agree beforehand who informs everyone.|فوراً ورودی تازه را پیام می‌کنم. خوب است تو کنار ورودی قدیم کمک می‌کنی. دفعه بعد پیشاپیش مشخص می‌کنیم چه کسی همه را خبر کند.

Hoe laat zal de medewerker Noor terugbellen?|At what time will the staff member call Noor back?|کارمند چه ساعتی دوباره به نور زنگ می‌زند؟
Om drie uur.|At three o'clock.|ساعت سه.
Om vijf uur.|At five o'clock.|ساعت پنج.
Goedendag Noor, ik moet eerst uw vraag opzoeken. Ik bel u om drie uur terug, zoals afgesproken. U hoeft zelf niet opnieuw te bellen. Laat even weten of u dan bereikbaar bent.|Hello Noor, I need to look up your question first. I will call you back at three as agreed. You do not need to call again yourself. Please let me know whether you will be available.|سلام نور، اول باید پاسخ سؤالتان را پیدا کنم. طبق قرار ساعت سه تماس می‌گیرم. لازم نیست خودتان دوباره زنگ بزنید. خبر بدهید آن وقت در دسترس هستید یا نه.
Om drie uur ben ik bereikbaar. Ik zet een herinnering in mijn agenda en houd mijn telefoon bij de hand. Bedankt dat u de informatie eerst opzoekt.|I will be available at three. I will set a calendar reminder and keep my phone nearby. Thank you for looking up the information first.|ساعت سه در دسترسم. یادآوری در تقویم می‌گذارم و تلفنم را نزدیک نگه می‌دارم. ممنون که ابتدا اطلاعات را پیدا می‌کنید.

Waarom was het bericht van Amina's vriendin zo kort?|Why was Amina's friend's message so brief?|چرا پیام دوست آمینه کوتاه بود؟
Ze had haast.|She was in a hurry.|عجله داشت.
Ze was boos op Amina.|She was angry with Amina.|از آمینه عصبانی بود.
Hoi Amina, sorry voor mijn korte bericht. Ik had haast en was helemaal niet boos op jou. Fijn dat je naar mijn bedoeling vroeg. Zullen we straks rustig verder praten wanneer ik meer tijd heb?|Hi Amina, sorry for my short message. I was in a hurry and not angry with you at all. Thank you for asking what I meant. Shall we talk calmly later when I have more time?|سلام آمینه، ببخش که پیامم کوتاه بود. عجله داشتم و اصلاً از تو عصبانی نبودم. خوب شد منظورت را پرسیدی. بعداً که وقت دارم آرام صحبت کنیم؟
Bedankt voor je uitleg. Ik had de toon verkeerd begrepen. We praten later rustig verder. Volgende keer vraag ik eerst wat je bedoelt in plaats van boosheid te veronderstellen.|Thanks for explaining. I misunderstood the tone. We can talk calmly later. Next time I will ask what you mean instead of assuming anger.|ممنون که توضیح دادی. لحن را اشتباه فهمیدم. بعداً آرام صحبت می‌کنیم. دفعه بعد به‌جای فرض عصبانیت، اول منظورت را می‌پرسم.

Over welk onderwerp begint Brams eerste gesprek?|What topic starts Bram's first conversation?|گفت‌وگوی اول برام درباره چیست؟
Fietsen.|Cycling.|دوچرخه‌سواری.
Werkcontracten.|Employment contracts.|قرارداد کار.
Dag Bram, je hoeft tijdens de eerste taalactiviteit niet lang te spreken. Ik fiets ook graag. Zullen we tien minuten over fietsen praten? Je mag altijd vragen om een woord te herhalen.|Hello Bram, you do not need to speak for long at your first language activity. I enjoy cycling too. Shall we talk about cycling for ten minutes? You can always ask me to repeat a word.|سلام برام، در فعالیت زبانی اول لازم نیست زیاد حرف بزنی. من هم دوچرخه‌سواری دوست دارم. ده دقیقه درباره آن صحبت کنیم؟ هر وقت خواستی بگو واژه‌ای را تکرار کنم.
Dat doe ik graag. Een kort gesprek over fietsen lijkt haalbaar. Als ik iets niet begrijp, vraag ik om herhaling. Daarna kunnen we kijken hoe het ging.|I would like that. A short cycling conversation sounds manageable. If I do not understand something, I will ask for repetition. Afterwards we can see how it went.|دوست دارم. گفت‌وگوی کوتاه درباره دوچرخه شدنی به نظر می‌رسد. اگر نفهمیدم، تکرار می‌خواهم. بعد بررسی می‌کنیم چطور بود.

Hoe maakt de organisator het plan duidelijker?|How does the organiser make the plan clearer?|برگزارکننده چطور برنامه را روشن‌تر می‌کند؟
Met drie stappen en een duidelijk doel.|With three steps and a clear goal.|با سه مرحله و هدف روشن.
Met extra ingewikkelde uitleg.|With more complicated explanation.|با توضیح پیچیده‌تر.
Beste groep, de uitleg van mijn voorstel was te ingewikkeld. Ik verdeel het plan nu in drie stappen met een duidelijk doel. Bekijk wat deze week haalbaar is en zeg welke stap nog uitleg nodig heeft.|Dear group, my proposal was explained too complicatedly. I am dividing the plan into three steps with a clear goal. Check what is feasible this week and say which step still needs explanation.|گروه عزیز، توضیح پیشنهادم پیچیده بود. حالا برنامه را به سه مرحله با هدف روشن تقسیم می‌کنم. ببینید این هفته چه شدنی است و کدام مرحله توضیح می‌خواهد.
Drie stappen maken het voorstel overzichtelijker. Ik bekijk wat ik deze week kan doen. Als een stap onduidelijk blijft, vraag ik een concreet voorbeeld voordat we beginnen.|Three steps make the proposal easier to follow. I will check what I can do this week. If a step is unclear, I will ask for an example before we start.|سه مرحله پیشنهاد را منظم‌تر می‌کند. بررسی می‌کنم این هفته چه می‌توانم انجام دهم. اگر مرحله‌ای نامفهوم بود، پیش از شروع مثال می‌خواهم.

Wat kiest de groep in plaats van de onveilige route?|What does the group choose instead of the unsafe route?|گروه به‌جای مسیر نامناسب چه انتخاب می‌کند؟
Een kortere tocht met een gezamenlijke pauze.|A shorter trip with a shared break.|مسیر کوتاه‌تر با استراحت مشترک.
Dezelfde lange route zonder pauze.|The same long route without a break.|همان مسیر بلند بدون استراحت.
Dag wandelaars, de goedkope uitstap heeft een route die niet voor iedereen veilig is. We kiezen een kortere tocht en houden samen pauze. Willen jullie zeggen of die afstand haalbaar is? Alleen de prijs beslist dus niet.|Hello walkers, the inexpensive outing has a route that is not safe for everyone. We are choosing a shorter trip with a shared break. Please say whether the distance is manageable. Price alone does not decide.|سلام دوستان پیاده‌روی، مسیر گردش ارزان برای همه ایمن نیست. مسیر کوتاه‌تر با استراحت مشترک انتخاب می‌کنیم. بگویید این فاصله برایتان شدنی است؛ فقط قیمت تعیین‌کننده نیست.
De kortere tocht past beter voor mij. Met een gezamenlijke pauze kan iedereen rusten. Kunt u de afstand doorgeven, zodat ik goed kan beoordelen of ik mee kan?|The shorter route suits me better. A shared break lets everyone rest. Could you send the distance so I can judge whether I can join?|مسیر کوتاه‌تر برایم بهتر است. با استراحت مشترک همه استراحت می‌کنند. فاصله را می‌گویید تا بفهمم می‌توانم بیایم یا نه؟

Wat doet de organisator voordat de gasten vertrekken?|What does the organiser do before guests leave?|برگزارکننده پیش از حرکت مهمان‌ها چه می‌کند؟
De binnenlocatie bevestigen.|Confirm the indoor venue.|محل داخل ساختمان را تأیید می‌کند.
Alle routebeschrijvingen verwijderen.|Delete all directions.|همه راهنماهای مسیر را پاک می‌کند.
Beste gasten, voor het buitenfeest wordt onweer voorspeld. We hebben daarom de binnenlocatie bevestigd. Ik stuur iedereen dezelfde routebeschrijving voordat jullie vertrekken. Controleer die nieuwe plaats en gebruik niet de oude uitnodiging.|Dear guests, thunderstorms are forecast for the outdoor party. We have therefore confirmed the indoor venue. I will send everyone the same directions before you leave. Check the new place and do not use the old invitation.|مهمانان عزیز، برای جشن بیرونی رعدوبرق پیش‌بینی شده. محل داخل را تأیید کردیم. پیش از حرکت، راهنمای یکسان برای همه می‌فرستم. مکان تازه را بررسی کنید و دعوت قبلی را ملاک نگیرید.
Bedankt voor het reserveplan. Ik controleer de nieuwe routebeschrijving voordat ik vertrek en geef de binnenlocatie ook aan mijn reisgenoot door. Zo rijden we meteen naar de juiste plaats.|Thanks for the backup plan. I will check the new directions before leaving and tell my travel companion the indoor location so we go straight to the right place.|ممنون برای برنامه جایگزین. پیش از حرکت مسیر تازه را بررسی می‌کنم و محل داخلی را به همراهم هم می‌گویم تا مستقیم به جای درست برویم.

Wanneer beslist de club over elke winterwandeling?|When does the club decide about each winter walk?|باشگاه چه زمانی درباره هر پیاده‌روی زمستانی تصمیم می‌گیرد؟
Op de avond ervoor.|The evening before.|شب قبل.
Pas na het vertrek.|Only after departure.|فقط بعد از حرکت.
Hallo clubleden, voor elke winterwandeling nemen we de avond ervoor een beslissing. We bekijken de omstandigheden en plaatsen dan de definitieve informatie op onze vaste plek. Kijk daar vóór je vertrekt, ook als je eerder al een uitnodiging kreeg.|Hello club members, we decide about each winter walk the evening before. We review conditions and post the final information in our usual place. Check there before leaving even if you already received an invitation.|اعضای باشگاه، برای هر پیاده‌روی زمستانی شب قبل تصمیم می‌گیریم. شرایط را بررسی و خبر نهایی را در جای همیشگی می‌گذاریم. پیش از حرکت آنجا را ببینید، حتی اگر دعوت قبلی دارید.
Ik controleer de definitieve informatie de avond ervoor. Kunt u de vaste plek nog eens doorgeven? Dan weet ik waar ik kijk als het weer verandert.|I will check the final information the evening before. Could you repeat where it is posted? Then I know where to look if the weather changes.|خبر نهایی را شب قبل بررسی می‌کنم. محل انتشار را دوباره می‌گویید تا اگر هوا عوض شد بدانم کجا ببینم؟

Wat raadpleegt Lina wanneer ze twijfelt over afval?|What does Lina consult when unsure about waste?|لینا هنگام تردید درباره زباله چه بررسی می‌کند؟
De plaatselijke sorteerwijzer.|The local sorting guide.|راهنمای تفکیک محلی.
Een willekeurige foto van afvalbakken.|A random picture of bins.|عکسی تصادفی از سطل‌ها.
Dag opruimgroep, ik twijfel wat in de restafvalbak hoort. Ik lees eerst de plaatselijke sorteerwijzer. Willen jullie daarna helpen om duidelijke voorbeelden op onze borden te schrijven? Dan hoeven bezoekers niet te gokken.|Hello clean-up group, I am unsure what belongs in general waste. I will read the local sorting guide first. Could you then help write clear examples on our signs so visitors do not have to guess?|سلام گروه نظافت، مطمئن نیستم چه چیزی در زباله معمولی می‌رود. اول راهنمای محلی را می‌خوانم. بعد برای نوشتن مثال روشن روی تابلوها کمک می‌کنید تا بازدیدکنندگان حدس نزنند؟
Ik help met de borden nadat we de plaatselijke uitleg gecontroleerd hebben. We schrijven voorbeelden die bij deze inzameling passen en vragen uitleg als iets onduidelijk blijft.|I will help with the signs after we check the local guidance. We will write examples suitable for this collection and ask if anything remains unclear.|بعد از بررسی راهنمای محلی با تابلوها کمک می‌کنم. مثال مناسب این جمع‌آوری می‌نویسیم و هرجا نامفهوم بود توضیح می‌خواهیم.

Welk voorwerp houdt Koen apart?|Which item does Koen keep separate?|کون کدام وسیله را جدا می‌گذارد؟
De batterij.|The battery.|باتری.
De hark.|The rake.|شن‌کش.
Hallo, Koen hier. Ik vond een batterij tussen het groenafval. Ik houd die apart en zoek het juiste inzamelpunt op. De andere voorwerpen sorteren we volgens de gemeentelijke uitleg. Kun je mee de informatie opzoeken?|Hello, Koen here. I found a battery among the garden waste. I am keeping it separate and looking up the right collection point. We will sort the other items using municipal guidance. Can you help find the information?|سلام، کون هستم. بین زباله باغ باتری پیدا کردم. جدا می‌گذارم و محل جمع‌آوری درست را پیدا می‌کنم. بقیه را طبق راهنمای شهرداری جدا می‌کنیم. برای پیدا کردن اطلاعات کمک می‌کنی؟
Ik zoek mee naar het juiste inzamelpunt voor de batterij. We controleren de gemeentelijke informatie en houden twijfelachtige voorwerpen apart tot we weten waar ze horen.|I will help find the battery collection point. We will check municipal information and keep uncertain items separate until we know where they belong.|برای پیدا کردن محل باتری کمک می‌کنم. اطلاعات شهرداری را بررسی می‌کنیم و موارد نامطمئن را تا روشن شدن محلشان جدا می‌گذاریم.

Bij welk kledingstuk klopt het maatkaartje niet met de pasvorm?|Which garment's size label does not match its fit?|برچسب اندازه کدام لباس با تن‌خورش جور نیست؟
Het hemd.|The shirt.|پیراهن.
De rok.|The skirt.|دامن.
Goedendag, dit hemd lijkt kleiner dan de maat op het kaartje. We willen het eerst nameten voordat we een ander exemplaar kiezen. Kunt u ons helpen de maat en pasvorm te vergelijken?|Hello, this shirt seems smaller than the size on the label. We want to measure it before choosing another. Could you help compare its size and fit?|سلام، این پیراهن از اندازه روی برچسب کوچک‌تر به نظر می‌رسد. پیش از انتخاب دیگری می‌خواهیم اندازه بگیریم. برای مقایسه اندازه و تن‌خور کمک می‌کنید؟
Natuurlijk, we vergelijken eerst de maten. Alleen het kaartje is blijkbaar niet voldoende. Daarna kunt u een ander hemd passen en controleren of dat werkelijk beter zit.|Of course, we will compare the measurements first. The label alone apparently is not enough. Then you can try another shirt and check whether it actually fits better.|حتماً، اول اندازه‌ها را مقایسه می‌کنیم. ظاهراً برچسب کافی نیست. بعد پیراهن دیگری امتحان می‌کنید تا ببینید واقعاً بهتر است یا نه.

Welk gebrek meldt Nisa bij de kledingruil?|Which defect does Nisa disclose at the clothes swap?|نیسا در مبادله لباس چه ایرادی را خبر می‌دهد؟
Een losse knoop aan de jurk.|A loose button on the dress.|دکمه شل روی پیراهن زنانه.
Een kapotte rits aan de jas.|A broken zip on the coat.|زیپ خراب کت.
Dag, ik wil deze jurk ruilen, maar er zit een losse knoop aan. Dat zeg ik liever vooraf. Verder heb ik een T-shirt en een sjaal bij. Mijn muts en riem houd ik zelf. Wil iemand de jurk herstellen?|Hello, I want to swap this dress, but it has a loose button. I would rather say so first. I also brought a T-shirt and scarf. I am keeping my hat and belt. Would anyone like to repair the dress?|سلام، می‌خواهم این پیراهن را مبادله کنم، ولی دکمه‌اش شل است؛ بهتر است از قبل بگویم. تی‌شرت و شال هم آوردم. کلاه و کمربند را نگه می‌دارم. کسی می‌خواهد پیراهن را تعمیر کند؟
Bedankt dat je de losse knoop vermeldt. Ik bekijk de jurk en beslis of ik die kan herstellen. Zo weet ik vooraf wat ik bij de ruil krijg.|Thanks for mentioning the loose button. I will look at the dress and decide whether I can repair it. Then I know beforehand what I get in the swap.|ممنون که دکمه شل را گفتی. لباس را می‌بینم و تصمیم می‌گیرم می‌توانم درستش کنم یا نه. این‌طور از قبل می‌دانم در مبادله چه می‌گیرم.

Hoe lossen de sporters het tekort aan rackets op?|How do the players solve the racket shortage?|ورزشکاران کمبود راکت را چگونه حل می‌کنند؟
Ze spreken korte oefenbeurten af.|They arrange short practice turns.|نوبت‌های کوتاه تمرین می‌گذارند.
Ze stoppen alle activiteiten.|They stop all activities.|همه فعالیت‌ها را قطع می‌کنند.
Hoi sporters, twee mensen willen hetzelfde racket. We spreken korte beurten af en proberen tussendoor een andere activiteit. Bespreek samen wie eerst begint en wanneer jullie wisselen. Zo krijgt iedereen een kans.|Hi players, two people want the same racket. We will arrange short turns and try another activity in between. Agree who starts and when you switch so everyone gets a chance.|سلام ورزشکاران، دو نفر یک راکت می‌خواهند. نوبت کوتاه می‌گذاریم و بینش کار دیگری امتحان می‌کنیم. توافق کنید چه کسی اول باشد و کی عوض کنید تا همه فرصت داشته باشند.
Laten we om de beurt oefenen. Jij kunt eerst het racket gebruiken terwijl ik een andere activiteit probeer. Daarna wisselen we op het afgesproken moment.|Let us take turns practising. You can use the racket first while I try another activity. Then we will switch at the agreed time.|نوبتی تمرین کنیم. تو اول راکت را بگیر و من فعالیت دیگری امتحان می‌کنم. بعد در وقت توافق‌شده عوض می‌کنیم.

Hoe vindt de begeleider de ontbrekende sportspullen terug?|How does the supervisor trace the missing sports equipment?|سرپرست وسایل ورزشی گمشده را چطور پیگیری می‌کند؟
Via de uitleenlijst.|Using the lending list.|با فهرست امانت.
Door iedereen te beschuldigen.|By accusing everyone.|با متهم کردن همه.
Hallo, na de sportdag ontbreken een zwembril en een stopwatch. Ik controleer de uitleenlijst voordat ik mensen aanspreek. Kijk thuis even of je materiaal vergeten bent terug te brengen. Je kunt het morgen afgeven.|Hello, after sports day a pair of swimming goggles and a stopwatch are missing. I am checking the lending list before contacting people. Check at home for anything you forgot to return. You can hand it in tomorrow.|سلام، بعد از روز ورزش عینک شنا و کرنومتر نیستند. پیش از تماس با افراد فهرست امانت را بررسی می‌کنم. خانه ببینید چیزی را پس نداده‌اید؛ فردا می‌توانید تحویل دهید.
Ik controleer mijn sporttas en laat weten of ik iets vergeten ben. Als ik de spullen vind, breng ik ze morgen terug. Goed dat u eerst de uitleenlijst bekijkt.|I will check my sports bag and say if I forgot anything. If I find the items, I will return them tomorrow. It is good that you check the lending list first.|کیف ورزشی را بررسی می‌کنم و اگر چیزی جا مانده خبر می‌دهم. اگر پیدا کردم فردا برمی‌گردانم. خوب است اول فهرست را بررسی می‌کنید.

Welke activiteit kiest de groep voor deze week?|Which activity does the group choose this week?|گروه این هفته کدام فعالیت را انتخاب می‌کند؟
Een korte wandeling.|A short walk.|پیاده‌روی کوتاه.
Een volledige zwemcursus.|A full swimming course.|دوره کامل شنا.
Dag vrienden, we hebben verschillende voorkeuren. Deze week stel ik een korte wandeling voor; volgende week proberen we iets anders. Koop nog geen jaarabonnement. Laat weten of je nu wilt meewandelen en wat je later wilt proberen.|Hello friends, we have different preferences. This week I suggest a short walk; next week we can try something else. Do not buy an annual pass yet. Say whether you want to walk now and what you would like to try later.|سلام دوستان، سلیقه‌ها فرق دارد. این هفته پیاده‌روی کوتاه و هفته بعد کار دیگری امتحان کنیم. هنوز اشتراک سالانه نخرید. بگویید این بار می‌آیید و بعداً چه می‌خواهید امتحان کنید.
Een korte wandeling doe ik graag mee. Volgende week wil ik zwemmen proberen. Eerst enkele activiteiten uitproberen helpt mij kiezen voordat ik een lang abonnement neem.|I would enjoy joining a short walk. Next week I would like to try swimming. Trying several activities helps me choose before taking a long membership.|برای پیاده‌روی کوتاه می‌آیم. هفته بعد شنا را دوست دارم امتحان کنم. امتحان چند فعالیت کمک می‌کند قبل از اشتراک بلندمدت انتخاب کنم.

Voor welke activiteiten is vooraf inschrijven nodig?|Which activities need advance registration?|برای کدام فعالیت‌ها ثبت‌نام قبلی لازم است؟
Schaatsen en roeien.|Skating and rowing.|اسکیت روی یخ و پاروزنی.
Dansen en tennissen.|Dancing and tennis.|رقص و تنیس.
Goedemorgen, welkom op onze open dag. Voor schaatsen en roeien moet u vooraf inschrijven. Bekijk het programma voordat u twee proeflessen kiest. Bij het onthaal kunt u vragen welke kleding nodig is.|Good morning, welcome to our open day. Skating and rowing require advance registration. Check the programme before choosing two trial lessons. You can ask at reception what clothing you need.|صبح بخیر، به روز باز ما خوش آمدید. اسکیت روی یخ و پاروزنی ثبت‌نام قبلی می‌خواهند. پیش از انتخاب دو جلسه آزمایشی برنامه را ببینید. از پذیرش بپرسید چه لباسی لازم است.
Ik bekijk eerst het programma en controleer de inschrijving voor schaatsen en roeien. Daarna kies ik mijn proeflessen. Kunt u uitleggen welke kleding ik daarvoor moet meebrengen?|I will check the programme and registration for skating and rowing first. Then I will choose my trial lessons. Could you explain what clothes to bring?|اول برنامه و ثبت‌نام اسکیت و پاروزنی را بررسی می‌کنم. بعد جلسه‌هایم را انتخاب می‌کنم. توضیح می‌دهید چه لباسی بیاورم؟

Waar wacht Daan op de verkeerde plaats?|Where is Daan waiting in the wrong place?|دان کجا اشتباهی منتظر است؟
Op het plein naast het stadhuis.|In the square beside the town hall.|در میدان کنار شهرداری.
Bij de ingang van de bibliotheek.|At the library entrance.|جلوی ورودی کتابخانه.
Hallo begeleider, Daan hier. Ik sta op het plein naast het stadhuis en zie het park. Misschien ben ik op de verkeerde plaats, want de uitnodiging zegt bibliotheek. Kunt u een herkenbaar punt bij de juiste startplaats noemen?|Hello leader, Daan here. I am in the square beside the town hall and can see the park. I may be in the wrong place because the invitation says library. Could you name a landmark at the correct starting point?|سلام راهنما، دان هستم. در میدان کنار شهرداری‌ام و پارک را می‌بینم. شاید اشتباه آمده‌ام، چون دعوت کتابخانه را گفته. نشانه مشخصی در نقطه شروع درست می‌گویید؟
De wandeling begint bij de bibliotheek, niet bij het stadhuis. Ik zoek een herkenbaar ontmoetingspunt en leg uit hoe je daar komt. Blijf even waar je bent.|The walk starts at the library, not the town hall. I will find a recognisable meeting point and explain how to reach it. Stay where you are for a moment.|پیاده‌روی از کتابخانه شروع می‌شود، نه شهرداری. نشانه مشخصی پیدا می‌کنم و راه را توضیح می‌دهم. فعلاً همان‌جا بمان.

Waarom wil een deelnemer onderweg afslaan?|Why does one participant want to leave the route?|چرا یکی از شرکت‌کنندگان می‌خواهد از مسیر جدا شود؟
Hij moet later bij de sporthal zijn.|He needs to be at the sports hall later.|بعداً باید در سالن ورزش باشد.
Hij wil het museum helemaal vermijden.|He wants to avoid the museum entirely.|می‌خواهد اصلاً موزه نرود.
Dag begeleider, ik wandel graag mee, maar moet later bij de sporthal zijn. Kunt u op de kaart een afslag tonen waar ik de groep op tijd kan verlaten? Dan kan ik toch een deel van de wandeling volgen.|Hello leader, I would like to join the walk but need to be at the sports hall later. Could you show a turn on the map where I can leave in time? Then I can still join part of the walk.|سلام راهنما، دوست دارم همراه باشم ولی بعداً باید سالن ورزش بروم. روی نقشه نقطه‌ای برای جدا شدن به‌موقع نشان می‌دهید؟ این‌طور بخشی از پیاده‌روی را شرکت می‌کنم.
We bekijken de kaart en jouw vertrektijd samen. Ik wijs de afslag naar de sporthal aan. Laat bij het vertrekken weten dat je daar de groep verlaat.|We will look at the map and your departure time together. I will show the turn towards the sports hall. When leaving, tell us you are leaving the group there.|نقشه و زمان رفتنت را با هم بررسی می‌کنیم. پیچ به سمت سالن را نشان می‌دهم. موقع جدا شدن بگو از همان‌جا گروه را ترک می‌کنی.

Waarom verandert Rosa de volgorde van haar boodschappen?|Why does Rosa change the order of her shopping?|چرا رزا ترتیب خریدها را عوض می‌کند؟
Eén winkel sluit vroeger.|One shop closes earlier.|یکی از فروشگاه‌ها زودتر می‌بندد.
Alle winkels verkopen hetzelfde.|All shops sell the same things.|همه مغازه‌ها یک چیز می‌فروشند.
Hoi, Rosa hier. Eén winkel op mijn lijst sluit veel vroeger dan de andere. Ik ga daar dus eerst heen. De minst dringende aankoop kan tot morgen wachten. Kun je mee controleren welke boodschappen vandaag echt nodig zijn?|Hi, Rosa here. One shop on my list closes much earlier than the others, so I will go there first. The least urgent purchase can wait until tomorrow. Can you help check which things are really needed today?|سلام، رزا هستم. یک مغازه فهرستم خیلی زودتر می‌بندد؛ اول آنجا می‌روم. خرید کم‌اهمیت‌تر تا فردا صبر می‌کند. کمک می‌کنی ببینیم امروز چه واقعاً لازم است؟
We zetten de dringende boodschappen bovenaan en houden rekening met de sluitingsuren. Wat morgen ook kan, halen we later. Zo hoef je niet onnodig te haasten.|We will put urgent purchases first and consider closing times. Anything that can wait can be bought later. You will not need to rush unnecessarily.|خرید فوری را اول می‌گذاریم و ساعت بسته شدن را در نظر می‌گیریم. چیزهای قابل‌انتظار را بعداً می‌گیریم تا بی‌دلیل عجله نکنی.

Wat maakt Ilias' cadeau persoonlijk?|What makes Ilias's gift personal?|چه چیز هدیه الیاس را شخصی می‌کند؟
Een boek over de geboorteplaats van zijn vriend en een kaart.|A book about his friend's birthplace and a card.|کتابی درباره زادگاه دوستش و کارت.
Een duur boek zonder boodschap.|An expensive book without a message.|کتاب گران بدون پیام.
Dag, Ilias hier. In de kringwinkel vond ik een boek over de geboorteplaats van mijn vriend. Ik wil er een persoonlijke kaart bij schrijven in plaats van iets duurs te kopen. Wil je me helpen een passende boodschap te formuleren?|Hello, Ilias here. In the second-hand shop I found a book about my friend's birthplace. I want to write a personal card rather than buy something expensive. Could you help me phrase a suitable message?|سلام، الیاس هستم. در دست‌دوم‌فروشی کتابی درباره زادگاه دوستم پیدا کردم. به‌جای چیز گران، کارت شخصی می‌نویسم. کمک می‌کنی پیام مناسبی بنویسم؟
Dat boek heeft een duidelijke band met je vriend. Schrijf op de kaart waarom je juist dat boek koos. Een persoonlijke herinnering maakt de boodschap warmer dan alleen een algemene groet.|That book has a clear connection to your friend. Write why you chose that book. A personal memory makes the message warmer than a general greeting.|کتاب ارتباط روشنی با دوستت دارد. روی کارت بنویس چرا همین کتاب را انتخاب کردی. خاطره شخصی پیام را از سلام کلی گرم‌تر می‌کند.

Welke fout vindt Maya in haar bestand?|What error does Maya find in her file?|مایا چه اشتباهی در فایل می‌بیند؟
De naam van een andere afzender.|Another sender's name.|نام فرستنده دیگر.
Een ontbrekende foto van de winkel.|A missing shop photo.|عکس گمشده فروشگاه.
Hoi Maya, in het oude voorbeeld staat nog de naam van een andere afzender. Pas de gegevens aan voordat je het bestand verstuurt. Controleer ook het e-mailadres, de ontvanger en het onderwerp. Open de bijlage daarna nog één keer.|Hi Maya, the old template still has another sender's name. Change the details before sending the file. Check the email address, recipient and subject too. Then open the attachment once more.|سلام مایا، الگوی قبلی هنوز نام فرستنده دیگری دارد. قبل از ارسال اطلاعات را عوض کن. نشانی ایمیل، گیرنده و موضوع را هم بررسی کن؛ بعد پیوست را یک بار باز کن.
Ik vervang de oude afzendergegevens en controleer de ontvanger. Daarna open ik het bestand opnieuw. Zo zie ik of het bericht en de bijlage echt bij deze verzending passen.|I will replace the old sender details and check the recipient. Then I will reopen the file to see whether the message and attachment fit this sending.|اطلاعات فرستنده قبلی را عوض و گیرنده را بررسی می‌کنم. بعد فایل را باز می‌کنم تا ببینم پیام و پیوست واقعاً مناسب این ارسال هستند.

Hoe maakt Tarek de bestandsversie herkenbaar?|How does Tarek make the file version identifiable?|طارق نسخه فایل را چطور مشخص می‌کند؟
Hij geeft het bestand een datum.|He adds a date to the file.|برای فایل تاریخ می‌گذارد.
Hij verwijdert de bestandsnaam.|He removes the file name.|نام فایل را پاک می‌کند.
Dag Tarek, ik weet niet welke versie achter jouw link staat. Geef het bestand een duidelijke datum en zet je naam onder het bericht. Stuur de link daarna opnieuw, zodat ik de juiste versie kan openen.|Hello Tarek, I do not know which version your link points to. Give the file a clear date and put your name under the message. Then resend the link so I can open the correct version.|سلام طارق، نمی‌دانم لینکت کدام نسخه است. تاریخ روشن به فایل بده و نامت را زیر پیام بگذار. بعد لینک را بفرست تا نسخه درست را باز کنم.
Ik voeg een datum toe aan de bestandsnaam en zet mijn naam onder het nieuwe bericht. Daarna stuur ik dezelfde bedoelde versie met een duidelijkere linkbeschrijving.|I will add a date to the file name and put my name under the new message. Then I will send the intended version with a clearer link description.|تاریخ به نام فایل اضافه می‌کنم و نامم را زیر پیام تازه می‌گذارم. بعد نسخه موردنظر را با توضیح روشن‌تر لینک می‌فرستم.

Hoe toont de groep het programma zonder printerpapier?|How does the group show the programme without printer paper?|گروه بدون کاغذ چاپگر برنامه را چطور نشان می‌دهد؟
Met de projector.|With the projector.|با ویدئوپروژکتور.
Door de uitnodiging te verwijderen.|By deleting the invitation.|با حذف دعوت‌نامه.
Hallo team, de printer heeft geen papier. We tonen het programma daarom met de projector. Wie een papieren versie nodig heeft, kan dat melden; die regelen we later. Kun je controleren of iedereen het scherm kan lezen?|Hello team, the printer has no paper. We will therefore show the programme with the projector. Anyone needing a paper version can say so and we will arrange it later. Can you check that everyone can read the screen?|سلام گروه، چاپگر کاغذ ندارد؛ برنامه را با ویدئوپروژکتور نشان می‌دهیم. هرکس نسخه کاغذی می‌خواهد بگوید تا بعد تهیه کنیم. بررسی می‌کنی همه صفحه را بخوانند؟
Ik controleer of de letters op het scherm groot genoeg zijn. Ik vraag ook wie papier nodig heeft en geef die namen door, zodat niemand de informatie mist.|I will check that the letters on screen are large enough. I will ask who needs paper and pass on the names so nobody misses the information.|اندازه حروف صفحه را بررسی می‌کنم. می‌پرسم چه کسی کاغذ لازم دارد و نام‌ها را می‌دهم تا کسی اطلاعات را از دست ندهد.

Hoe meldt Fien dat ze niets hoort?|How does Fien report that she cannot hear anything?|فین چطور خبر می‌دهد چیزی نمی‌شنود؟
Ze schrijft in de chat.|She writes in the chat.|در چت می‌نویسد.
Ze drukt de uitnodiging af.|She prints the invitation.|دعوت را چاپ می‌کند.
Hoi Fien, ik zag je bericht in de chat dat je niets hoort. Het beeld werkt wel. Kijk bij de geluidskeuze welke luidspreker geselecteerd is. Schrijf daarna in de chat of je ons kunt horen.|Hi Fien, I saw your chat message saying you cannot hear anything. The video does work. Check which speaker is selected in the sound settings. Then write in the chat whether you can hear us.|سلام فین، پیام چتت را دیدم که چیزی نمی‌شنوی. تصویر کار می‌کند. در تنظیم صدا ببین کدام بلندگو انتخاب شده. بعد در چت بنویس ما را می‌شنوی یا نه.
Ik controleer eerst de gekozen luidspreker. Tot het geluid werkt, gebruik ik de chat om te antwoorden. Daarna laat ik weten of ik jullie weer kan horen.|I will check the selected speaker first. Until sound works I will use the chat to reply. Then I will say whether I can hear you again.|اول بلندگوی انتخابی را بررسی می‌کنم. تا صدا درست شود از چت جواب می‌دهم. بعد خبر می‌دهم دوباره می‌شنوم یا نه.

Welke betaling moet Elise nog doen?|Which payment must Elise still make?|الیز هنوز کدام پرداخت را باید انجام دهد؟
De huur.|The rent.|اجاره.
Een al betaalde treinkaart.|An already paid train ticket.|بلیت قطاری که پرداخت شده.
Dag, Elise hier. Mijn saldo lijkt hoog na mijn loon, maar de huur moet nog betaald worden. Ook mijn spaargeld staat op die rekening. Ik zet de vaste bedragen eerst apart in mijn overzicht. Wil je mee controleren of mijn berekening volledig is?|Hello, Elise here. My balance looks high after payday, but rent still needs paying. My savings are in that account too. I will first separate fixed amounts in my overview. Can you check whether my calculation is complete?|سلام، الیز هستم. بعد از حقوق موجودی بالا دیده می‌شود، اما اجاره هنوز پرداخت نشده و پس‌انداز هم همان حساب است. اول مبلغ‌های ثابت را در جدول جدا می‌کنم. کامل بودن محاسبه را بررسی می‌کنی؟
We bekijken welke vaste bedragen al in je overzicht staan. Het saldo alleen zegt niet wat je vrij kunt uitgeven. Voeg ontbrekende betalingen toe voordat je een aankoop plant.|We will see which fixed amounts are listed. The balance alone does not show what is freely available. Add missing payments before planning a purchase.|می‌بینیم کدام هزینه ثابت در جدول هست. موجودی به‌تنهایی پول آزاد را نشان نمی‌دهد. پیش از خرید پرداخت‌های جاافتاده را اضافه کن.

Waarom wacht Karim met de aankoop?|Why does Karim postpone the purchase?|چرا کریم خرید را عقب می‌اندازد؟
De verwachte terugbetaling is nog niet binnen.|The expected refund has not arrived.|بازپرداخت موردانتظار نرسیده.
De winkel geeft geen enkele korting.|The shop offers no discount at all.|فروشگاه هیچ تخفیفی نمی‌دهد.
Goedendag, ik zie de korting, maar er is ook een waarborg. Mijn verwachte terugbetaling is nog niet binnen. Daarom koop ik vandaag nog niet. Kunt u schriftelijk uitleggen wanneer en onder welke voorwaarden de waarborg terugkomt?|Hello, I see the discount but there is also a deposit. My expected refund has not arrived yet, so I will not buy today. Could you explain in writing when and under what conditions the deposit is returned?|سلام، تخفیف را می‌بینم ولی ودیعه هم هست. بازپرداخت موردانتظارم نرسیده، پس امروز نمی‌خرم. کتبی توضیح می‌دهید ودیعه چه وقت و با چه شرایطی برمی‌گردد؟
Ik vraag de juiste voorwaarden voor u op en geef die schriftelijk mee. U kunt de totale uitgave rustig bekijken. Ik zal geen terugbetaling beloven zonder de voorwaarden te controleren.|I will obtain the correct conditions and give them in writing. You can review the total expense. I will not promise a refund without checking the conditions.|شرایط درست را می‌پرسم و کتبی می‌دهم. با آرامش کل هزینه را بررسی می‌کنید. بدون بررسی شرایط قول بازپرداخت نمی‌دهم.

Waarom maakt de vrijwilliger een apart bord bij de boeken?|Why does the volunteer make a separate sign by the books?|چرا داوطلب کنار کتاب‌ها تابلو جدا می‌گذارد؟
Om duidelijk te maken wat gratis geruild mag worden.|To clarify what may be swapped free.|برای روشن کردن موارد مبادله رایگان.
Om aan te geven welke boeken verkocht worden.|To show which books are being sold.|برای نشان دادن کتاب‌های فروشی.
Dag vrijwilliger, de boeken staan tussen de planten en bezoekers weten niet wat bij de gratis ruil hoort. Kun jij een apart bord maken? Zet duidelijk waar de boekenruil is en welke spullen daarvoor bedoeld zijn.|Hello volunteer, the books are among the plants and visitors do not know what belongs to the free swap. Could you make a separate sign? Clearly show where the book swap is and which items are meant for it.|سلام داوطلب، کتاب‌ها بین گیاهان‌اند و مردم نمی‌دانند چه چیز مبادله رایگان است. تابلو جدا درست می‌کنی؟ محل مبادله کتاب و وسایل مربوط را روشن نشان بده.
Ik maak een duidelijk bord voor de boekenruil en zet het bij de juiste tafel. Daarna vraag ik een bezoeker of het verschil met de rommelmarkt duidelijk is.|I will make a clear sign for the book swap and place it by the right table. Then I will ask a visitor whether the difference from the flea market is clear.|تابلو روشن برای مبادله کتاب می‌سازم و کنار میز درست می‌گذارم. بعد از بازدیدکننده می‌پرسم تفاوتش با بازار دست‌دوم روشن است یا نه.

Hoe verlaagt de groep de druk op drie vrijwilligers?|How does the group reduce pressure on three volunteers?|گروه فشار روی سه داوطلب را چطور کم می‌کند؟
Door korte taakblokken aan nieuwe helpers te geven.|By offering short task blocks to new helpers.|با دادن بخش‌های کوتاه کار به کمک‌کنندگان تازه.
Door alle activiteiten aan dezelfde drie mensen te geven.|By assigning everything to the same three people.|با سپردن همه کارها به همان سه نفر.
Hallo buurtgroep, drie vrijwilligers doen nu te veel taken tegelijk. We delen het werk op in korte blokken. Wil je één blok helpen bij de maaltijd of taalactiviteit? Zeg welke taak en welk moment voor jou haalbaar zijn.|Hello neighbourhood group, three volunteers are doing too many tasks at once. We are dividing work into short blocks. Would you help with one block at the meal or language activity? Say which task and time suit you.|سلام گروه محله، سه داوطلب کارهای زیادی را هم‌زمان انجام می‌دهند. کار را به بخش کوتاه تقسیم می‌کنیم. یک بخش در غذا یا فعالیت زبان کمک می‌کنی؟ بگو کدام کار و وقت شدنی است.
Ik kan één kort blok bij de taalactiviteit helpen. Laat weten wat er precies moet gebeuren en hoe lang het duurt. Zo neem ik een duidelijke taak over.|I can help with one short block at the language activity. Tell me exactly what needs doing and how long it takes so I can take over a clear task.|می‌توانم یک بخش کوتاه فعالیت زبان کمک کنم. بگویید دقیقاً چه باید کرد و چقدر طول می‌کشد تا وظیفه روشن بگیرم.

Welke vaardigheid oefent Els zelden?|Which skill does Els practise rarely?|الس کدام مهارت را کم تمرین می‌کند؟
Schrijven.|Writing.|نوشتن.
Lezen.|Reading.|خواندن.
Hoi Els, je leest vaak en spreekt soms, maar schrijft zelden. Je agenda toont ook dagen zonder oefening. Kies voor elke vaardigheid een klein doel. Zeg precies hoe vaak je het wilt doen in plaats van meteen elke dag te beloven.|Hi Els, you read often and speak sometimes but rarely write. Your calendar also shows days without practice. Choose a small goal for each skill. Say exactly how often instead of immediately promising every day.|سلام الس، زیاد می‌خوانی و گاهی حرف می‌زنی، اما کم می‌نویسی. تقویمت روز بدون تمرین هم دارد. برای هر مهارت هدف کوچکی انتخاب کن و دقیق بگو چندبار، نه اینکه فوراً هرروز قول بدهی.
Ik maak een haalbaar doel voor schrijven, omdat ik dat nu zelden doe. Daarna bekijk ik mijn agenda en kies vaste momenten. Mijn leesgewoonte beschrijf ik apart.|I will set a manageable writing goal because I rarely write now. Then I will check my calendar and choose regular times. I will describe reading habits separately.|برای نوشتن هدف شدنی می‌گذارم چون الان کم می‌نویسم. بعد تقویم را می‌بینم و زمان ثابت انتخاب می‌کنم. عادت خواندن را جدا توضیح می‌دهم.

Welk gegeven ontbreekt bij het woord morgen?|What information is missing beside the word tomorrow?|کنار واژه فردا چه اطلاعاتی کم است؟
Een precieze datum.|An exact date.|تاریخ دقیق.
De maandelijkse taakverdeling.|The monthly task allocation.|تقسیم کار ماهانه.
Dag organisator, in het bericht staat morgen, maar geen datum. Ik lees het pas vanavond en weet niet wanneer u het geschreven hebt. Wilt u de precieze datum toevoegen? Dan blijft de afspraak ook later duidelijk.|Hello organiser, the message says tomorrow but has no date. I am only reading it this evening and do not know when you wrote it. Could you add the exact date so the arrangement stays clear later?|سلام برگزارکننده، پیام «فردا» دارد ولی تاریخ ندارد. من تازه امشب می‌خوانم و نمی‌دانم کی نوشته‌اید. تاریخ دقیق را اضافه می‌کنید تا بعداً هم قرار روشن بماند؟
Je hebt gelijk: morgen kan verwarrend zijn als iemand later leest. Ik controleer de afspraak en voeg de volledige datum toe aan het bericht voor iedereen.|You are right: tomorrow can be confusing if someone reads later. I will check the appointment and add the full date to the message for everyone.|درست می‌گویی؛ فردا برای کسی که دیر می‌خواند مبهم است. قرار را بررسی و تاریخ کامل را برای همه به پیام اضافه می‌کنم.

Wat vraagt Sami bij elke functie?|What does Sami ask for each role?|سامی برای هر نقش چه می‌پرسد؟
Een naam en het soort vragen waarvoor die persoon helpt.|A name and the types of questions that person handles.|نام و نوع سؤال‌هایی که آن فرد پاسخ می‌دهد.
Alleen de leeftijd van die persoon.|Only that person's age.|فقط سن فرد.
Dag collega, Sami hier. Ik hoor veel functies, maar weet nog niet bij wie ik terechtkan. Kunt u bij elke rol een naam noemen en zeggen voor welke vragen die persoon helpt? Dan maak ik een bruikbaar lijstje.|Hello colleague, Sami here. I hear many job roles but do not know whom to ask. Could you give a name for each role and explain which questions they handle? Then I can make a useful list.|سلام همکار، سامی هستم. عنوان‌های زیادی می‌شنوم ولی نمی‌دانم از چه کسی بپرسم. برای هر نقش نام و نوع سؤال‌ها را می‌گویید تا فهرست مفیدی بسازم؟
We maken samen een lijst met namen en verantwoordelijkheden. Voor een nieuwe vraag kun je dan de juiste contactpersoon zoeken. Als twee rollen onduidelijk blijven, vragen we extra uitleg.|We will make a list of names and responsibilities together. Then you can find the right contact for a new question. If two roles remain unclear, we will ask for clarification.|فهرست نام‌ها و مسئولیت‌ها را با هم می‌سازیم تا برای سؤال تازه فرد درست پیدا شود. اگر دو نقش مبهم ماند، توضیح بیشتر می‌خواهیم.

Wat vult Mira na de vraag van haar vervanger aan?|What does Mira add after her replacement's question?|میرا بعد از سؤال جانشین چه اضافه می‌کند؟
De volgorde en uiterste tijden van de telefoons.|The order and deadlines for the calls.|ترتیب و آخرین زمان تماس‌ها.
Een nieuwe vakantiebestemming.|A new holiday destination.|مقصد تازه تعطیلات.
Hallo Mira, ik neem je afspraken over tijdens je vakantie. Ik zie dat de klant en leverancier gebeld moeten worden, maar niet welke telefoon eerst moet. Kun je de volgorde en uiterste tijden aanvullen voordat je vertrekt?|Hello Mira, I am taking over your appointments during your holiday. I see the client and supplier need calls but not which comes first. Could you add the order and deadlines before you leave?|سلام میرا، زمان تعطیلاتت قرارها را می‌گیرم. می‌بینم باید به مشتری و تأمین‌کننده زنگ زد، ولی ترتیب روشن نیست. پیش از رفتن ترتیب و آخرین زمان را اضافه می‌کنی؟
Ik voeg de volgorde en uiterste tijden toe aan de overdracht. Daarna lopen we de eerste twee telefoons samen na. Zo weet je waar je mee begint.|I will add the order and deadlines to the handover. Then we will review the first two calls together so you know where to start.|ترتیب و آخرین زمان را به تحویل کار اضافه می‌کنم. بعد دو تماس اول را با هم بررسی می‌کنیم تا بدانی از کجا شروع کنی.

Met wie bespreekt Leen eerst haar opleidingsplan?|Whom does Leen first discuss her training plan with?|لین اول برنامه آموزش را با چه کسی مطرح می‌کند؟
Haar leidinggevende.|Her manager.|مدیرش.
De winkelier.|The shopkeeper.|فروشنده.
Dag leidinggevende, ik wil een opleiding volgen, maar mijn uurrooster wisselt vaak. Kunnen we eerst de mogelijke lesdagen bespreken? Ik wil een concreet voorstel maken en laten controleren welke afspraken daarvoor gelden.|Hello manager, I want to take a course but my schedule often changes. Could we discuss possible class days first? I want to make a concrete proposal and check which arrangements apply.|سلام مدیر، می‌خواهم دوره بگذرانم ولی برنامه‌ام زیاد عوض می‌شود. اول روزهای ممکن کلاس را بررسی کنیم؟ پیشنهاد مشخصی می‌خواهم که با شرایط مربوط سنجیده شود.
Breng je lesdagen en werkrooster mee. We bekijken de mogelijkheden en controleren daarna de geldende afspraken. Zo doen we geen toezegging voordat duidelijk is wat mogelijk is.|Bring your class days and work schedule. We will consider the options and then check the applicable arrangements. We will not promise anything before knowing what is possible.|روزهای کلاس و برنامه کار را بیاور. گزینه‌ها و بعد مقررات مربوط را بررسی می‌کنیم تا پیش از روشن شدن امکان، قول ندهیم.

Wat neemt Noor mee om haar geregistreerde uren te bespreken?|What does Noor bring to discuss her recorded hours?|نور برای بررسی ساعت ثبت‌شده چه می‌آورد؟
Haar eigen notities.|Her own notes.|یادداشت‌های خودش.
De agenda van een klant.|A client's calendar.|تقویم مشتری.
Dag verantwoordelijke, in het overzicht ontbreken enkele werktijden. Ik neem mijn eigen notities mee. Kunnen we beide versies vergelijken en ook bekijken hoe pauzes en overwerk genoteerd worden? Ik wil begrijpen waar het verschil ontstaat.|Hello supervisor, some working hours are missing from the overview. I will bring my own notes. Could we compare both versions and look at how breaks and overtime are recorded? I want to understand the difference.|سلام مسئول، بعضی ساعت‌ها در جدول نیستند. یادداشت‌هایم را می‌آورم. دو نسخه و روش ثبت استراحت و اضافه‌کاری را بررسی می‌کنیم؟ می‌خواهم دلیل تفاوت را بفهمم.
We leggen je notities naast het overzicht en bekijken de verschillen één voor één. Daarna leg ik de registratie uit. Wat niet duidelijk is, zoeken we verder uit.|We will put your notes beside the overview and examine differences one by one. Then I will explain the recording process and investigate anything unclear.|یادداشت‌هایت را کنار جدول می‌گذاریم و تفاوت‌ها را یکی‌یکی بررسی می‌کنیم. بعد روش ثبت را توضیح می‌دهم و موارد مبهم را پیگیری می‌کنیم.

Wat meldt Jonas aan de verhuurder?|What does Jonas report to the landlord?|یوناس به صاحب‌خانه چه گزارش می‌کند؟
Wat hij werkelijk ziet, met foto's.|What he actually sees, with photos.|آنچه واقعاً می‌بیند با عکس.
Een zekere diagnose zonder onderzoek.|A definite diagnosis without inspection.|تشخیص قطعی بدون بررسی.
Dag verhuurder, ik zie een vochtplek naast een lek. Ik stuur foto's van wat zichtbaar is. Ik weet niet of er ook schimmel of een verstopping is. Kunt u een onderzoek regelen in plaats van op mijn vermoedens af te gaan?|Hello landlord, I see a damp patch beside a leak. I am sending photos of what is visible. I do not know whether there is mould or a blockage too. Could you arrange an inspection rather than rely on my guesses?|سلام صاحب‌خانه، لکه رطوبت کنار نشتی می‌بینم و عکس قسمت قابل‌دیدن را می‌فرستم. نمی‌دانم کپک یا گرفتگی هم هست یا نه. به‌جای حدس من، بازدید هماهنگ می‌کنید؟
Dank u voor de duidelijke foto's. Ik noteer wat u hebt waargenomen en regel een onderzoek. We houden de vermoedens apart totdat de oorzaak gecontroleerd is.|Thank you for the clear photos. I will note your observations and arrange an inspection. We will keep guesses separate until the cause is checked.|ممنون برای عکس روشن. مشاهده‌ها را یادداشت و بازدید هماهنگ می‌کنم. حدس‌ها را تا بررسی علت جدا نگه می‌داریم.

Hoe koppelen bewoners de foto's aan de gebreken?|How do residents link photos to the defects?|ساکنان عکس‌ها را چطور به ایرادها وصل می‌کنند؟
Ze nummeren de foto's bij de beschrijvingen.|They number photos alongside descriptions.|عکس‌ها را کنار توضیح شماره می‌زنند.
Ze sturen losse foto's zonder uitleg.|They send separate photos without explanation.|عکس‌ها را بدون توضیح می‌فرستند.
Beste hersteller, we sturen een genummerde lijst met foto's van de gebreken. Bij elke foto staat een beschrijving van de juiste plaats. Wilt u laten weten welke informatie u nog nodig hebt om uw bezoek voor te bereiden?|Dear repairer, we are sending a numbered list with defect photos. Each photo describes the exact location. Please say what other information you need to prepare your visit.|تعمیرکار عزیز، فهرست شماره‌دار با عکس ایرادها می‌فرستیم. هر عکس توضیح محل دقیق دارد. بگویید برای آماده شدن بازدید چه اطلاعات دیگری می‌خواهید.
Ik bekijk de genummerde foto's en de beschrijvingen samen. Als een plaats onduidelijk is, vraag ik gericht extra informatie. Zo kan ik het nodige materiaal vooraf bespreken.|I will review the numbered photos and descriptions together. If a location is unclear, I will ask for specific details so I can discuss the required equipment beforehand.|عکس‌های شماره‌دار و توضیح را با هم می‌بینم. اگر محل مبهم باشد سؤال دقیق می‌پرسم تا وسایل لازم از قبل بررسی شود.

Welke uitleg vraagt Fien over de twee bedragen?|What explanation does Fien request about the two amounts?|فین درباره دو مبلغ چه توضیحی می‌خواهد؟
Welke kosten elk bedrag bevat.|Which costs each amount includes.|هر مبلغ شامل چه هزینه‌ای است.
Of beide bedragen al betaald zijn.|Whether both amounts have already been paid.|آیا هر دو مبلغ قبلاً پرداخت شده‌اند.
Goedendag, het bedrag in mijn huurcontract verschilt van dat op de factuur. Kunt u schriftelijk uitleggen welke kosten in elk bedrag zitten? Ik wil beide documenten vergelijken voordat ik besluit dat er een fout is.|Hello, the amount in my tenancy agreement differs from the invoice. Could you explain in writing which costs each amount includes? I want to compare both documents before deciding there is an error.|سلام، مبلغ قرارداد اجاره با فاکتور فرق دارد. کتبی توضیح می‌دهید هر مبلغ چه هزینه‌ای دارد؟ پیش از فرض اشتباه می‌خواهم دو مدرک را مقایسه کنم.
Ik vraag een uitsplitsing van de kosten voor beide documenten. Daarna kunnen we hetzelfde onderdeel met hetzelfde onderdeel vergelijken. Het verschil alleen bewijst nog niet waar de oorzaak ligt.|I will request an itemised breakdown for both documents. Then we can compare like components. The difference alone does not establish its cause.|ریز هزینه هر دو مدرک را می‌خواهم تا بخش یکسان را مقایسه کنیم. صرف تفاوت هنوز علت را ثابت نمی‌کند.

Wat zet Ali in zijn documentenlijst?|What does Ali put in his document list?|علی در فهرست مدارک چه می‌نویسد؟
Datums en vindplaatsen.|Dates and storage locations.|تاریخ‌ها و محل نگهداری.
Alleen documentnamen, zonder datum of map.|Only document names, without dates or folders.|فقط نام مدارک، بدون تاریخ و پوشه.
Hoi Ali, de verhuisdocumenten zitten in verschillende mappen. Maak een lijst met datums en vindplaatsen, ook voor het betalingsverzoek en de verzekeringspolis. Dan kun je bij een vraag meteen het juiste document terugvinden.|Hi Ali, the moving documents are in different folders. Make a list of dates and storage locations, including the payment request and insurance policy. Then you can find the correct document quickly when asked.|سلام علی، مدارک اسباب‌کشی در پوشه‌های مختلف‌اند. فهرست تاریخ و محل نگهداری بساز؛ درخواست پرداخت و بیمه‌نامه هم باشد. آن وقت برای هر سؤال مدرک درست را سریع پیدا می‌کنی.
Ik maak een overzicht met de datum en map van elk document. Daarna controleer ik of de meterstand en ontvangstbewijzen erbij staan. Zo hoef ik niet telkens alle papieren te doorzoeken.|I will list the date and folder for each document. Then I will check that meter readings and receipts are included so I need not search through all papers each time.|تاریخ و پوشه هر مدرک را فهرست می‌کنم. بعد عدد کنتور و رسیدها را بررسی می‌کنم تا هر بار همه کاغذها را نگردم.

Wie willen allebei dessert meebrengen?|Who both want to bring dessert?|چه کسانی هر دو می‌خواهند دسر بیاورند؟
Lila's zus en broer.|Lila's sister and brother.|خواهر و برادر لیلا.
Lila's moeder en grootmoeder.|Lila's mother and grandmother.|مادر و مادربزرگ لیلا.
Dag familie, mijn zus en broer willen allebei dessert meebrengen. Laten we eerst zeggen wie al iets gekocht heeft en wie nog geen taak heeft. Daarna verdelen we de overblijvende boodschappen, zodat niemand dubbel koopt.|Hello family, my sister and brother both want to bring dessert. Let us first say who already bought something and who has no task yet. Then we can divide the remaining shopping without buying duplicates.|سلام خانواده، خواهر و برادرم هر دو دسر می‌خواهند بیاورند. اول بگوییم چه کسی خرید کرده و چه کسی کار ندارد. بعد خرید باقی‌مانده را بدون تکرار تقسیم کنیم.
Ik vertel eerst wat ik al gekocht heb. Daarna kies ik een taak die nog vrij is. Zo stemmen we de boodschappen af en brengen we niet onnodig twee keer hetzelfde mee.|I will first say what I already bought. Then I will choose an unassigned task so we coordinate the shopping and do not bring the same thing twice unnecessarily.|اول می‌گویم چه خریده‌ام. بعد کار باقی‌مانده را می‌گیرم تا خرید هماهنگ شود و بی‌جهت یک چیز را دوبار نیاوریم.

Wat schrijft Noor achter op de foto's?|What does Noor write on the backs of the photos?|نور پشت عکس‌ها چه می‌نویسد؟
Namen en jaartallen.|Names and years.|نام‌ها و سال‌ها.
Alleen de plaats, zonder namen of jaartallen.|Only the place, without names or years.|فقط مکان، بدون نام یا سال.
Hallo Noor, op de oude foto's lijken je nicht en neef sterk op elkaar. Wil je namen en jaartallen achterop schrijven? Vertel bij één foto ook wie erbij was, zodat het verhaal later nog duidelijk is.|Hello Noor, your female and male cousins look very alike in the old photos. Could you write names and years on the back? Explain who was present in one photo too so the story remains clear later.|سلام نور، دخترخاله و پسرخاله‌ات در عکس قدیمی شبیه‌اند. نام و سال را پشت عکس می‌نویسی؟ درباره یکی هم بگو چه کسانی بودند تا داستان بعداً روشن بماند.
Ik schrijf namen en jaartallen op en controleer twijfelgevallen bij mijn familie. Bij één foto vertel ik een korte herinnering. Zo kan iemand anders de beelden later begrijpen.|I will add names and years and check uncertain details with family. I will tell a short memory for one photo so others can understand the pictures later.|نام و سال را می‌نویسم و مورد نامطمئن را از خانواده می‌پرسم. برای یک عکس خاطره کوتاه می‌گویم تا دیگران بعداً بفهمند.

Wat wil de vrijwilliger na zijn vergissing doen?|What does the volunteer want to do after his mistake?|داوطلب بعد از اشتباهش چه می‌خواهد بکند؟
Uitleg geven en een oplossing zoeken.|Explain and look for a solution.|توضیح بدهد و راه‌حل پیدا کند.
De vergissing blijven verbergen.|Keep hiding the mistake.|اشتباه را همچنان پنهان کند.
Dag vrijwilligers, ik heb een vergissing gemaakt en durfde die eerst niet te melden. Ik wil nu rustig uitleggen wat misliep en hoe ik het kan herstellen. Willen jullie mee kijken naar een haalbare oplossing?|Hello volunteers, I made a mistake and was afraid to report it at first. I now want to explain calmly what went wrong and how I can repair it. Could you help look for a workable solution?|سلام داوطلبان، اشتباه کردم و اول جرئت گفتن نداشتم. حالا آرام توضیح می‌دهم چه شد و چگونه جبران کنم. برای راه‌حل عملی کمک می‌کنید؟
Bedankt dat je het duidelijk meldt. Vertel wat er gebeurde en wat je voorstel is. We bekijken samen wat hersteld kan worden en wie daarbij kan helpen.|Thank you for reporting it clearly. Tell us what happened and what you propose. We will look together at what can be fixed and who can help.|ممنون که روشن گفتی. بگو چه شد و پیشنهادت چیست. با هم می‌بینیم چه قابل‌اصلاح است و چه کسی کمک می‌کند.

Wat mag de nieuwe buur volgens de uitnodiging doen?|What may the new neighbour do according to the invitation?|همسایه تازه طبق دعوت چه اجازه‌ای دارد؟
Zonder iets mee te brengen een halfuur blijven.|Stay half an hour without bringing anything.|بدون آوردن چیزی نیم‌ساعت بماند.
Alleen komen als hij een hele avond vrij is.|Come only if free for the whole evening.|فقط اگر تمام شب آزاد است بیاید.
Dag nieuwe buur, je bent welkom bij ons. Je hoeft niets mee te brengen en mag gerust maar een halfuur blijven. We willen dat je zonder druk kunt kennismaken. Laat weten of deze uitleg duidelijk is.|Hello new neighbour, you are welcome with us. You do not need to bring anything and may stay only half an hour. We want you to meet people without pressure. Let us know whether this is clear.|سلام همسایه تازه، خوش آمدی. لازم نیست چیزی بیاوری و نیم‌ساعت ماندن هم خوب است. می‌خواهیم بدون فشار آشنا شوی. بگو این توضیح روشن است یا نه.
Bedankt voor de duidelijke uitnodiging. Een halfuur past goed en ik begrijp dat ik niets hoef mee te brengen. Kunt u nog zeggen hoe laat ik kan langskomen?|Thank you for the clear invitation. Half an hour suits me and I understand I need not bring anything. Could you say what time I may come?|ممنون برای دعوت روشن. نیم‌ساعت مناسب است و فهمیدم چیزی لازم نیست بیاورم. می‌گویید چه ساعتی می‌توانم بیایم؟

Wat bespreken de vrienden voordat ze een avondactiviteit kiezen?|What do the friends discuss before choosing an evening activity?|دوستان قبل از انتخاب برنامه شب چه بررسی می‌کنند؟
Hoe laat iedereen thuis moet zijn.|When everyone needs to be home.|هرکس چه ساعتی باید خانه باشد.
Welke film het duurste kaartje heeft.|Which film has the most expensive ticket.|کدام فیلم گران‌ترین بلیت دارد.
Hoi vrienden, er zijn vanavond veel activiteiten. Zeg eerst hoe laat je thuis moet zijn. Dan schrappen we opties die te laat eindigen en kiezen we iets dat voor iedereen past. De mooiste affiche alleen helpt ons niet kiezen.|Hi friends, there are many activities tonight. First say when you need to be home. Then we can remove options that finish too late and choose something suitable for everyone. The prettiest poster alone will not help.|سلام دوستان، امشب برنامه زیاد است. اول بگویید چه ساعتی باید خانه باشید؛ گزینه دیرتمام را حذف و برنامه مناسب همه انتخاب کنیم. فقط پوستر زیبا انتخاب را حل نمی‌کند.
Ik geef mijn uiterste thuistijd door voordat we kiezen. Daarna vergelijken we de eindtijden van de activiteiten. Zo vermijden we een plan waar iemand halverwege moet vertrekken.|I will give my latest home time before we choose. Then we will compare finishing times and avoid a plan requiring someone to leave halfway.|پیش از انتخاب آخرین زمان رسیدن به خانه را می‌گویم. بعد پایان برنامه‌ها را مقایسه می‌کنیم تا کسی مجبور نشود وسط کار برود.

Wat maakt Farah tijdens de workshop?|What does Farah make in the workshop?|فرح در کارگاه چه می‌سازد؟
Een klein boekje.|A small booklet.|دفترچه کوچک.
Een houten stoel.|A wooden chair.|صندلی چوبی.
Hoi, Farah hier. In de workshop heb ik voor het eerst een boekje gemaakt. Ik leerde er ook een weetje dat vanavond bij de quiz kan helpen. Kom je erbij? Dan vertel ik hoe we het boekje gemaakt hebben.|Hi, Farah here. I made a booklet for the first time in the workshop. I also learned a fact that could help at tonight's quiz. Will you join us? Then I will explain how we made it.|سلام، فرح هستم. در کارگاه اولین دفترچه‌ام را ساختم و نکته‌ای یاد گرفتم که در مسابقه امشب کمک می‌کند. می‌آیی؟ روش ساخت را هم تعریف می‌کنم.
Ik kom graag luisteren hoe je het boekje gemaakt hebt. Vertel ook welk weetje je geleerd hebt. Misschien kunnen we die nieuwe kennis inderdaad samen gebruiken bij de quiz.|I would like to hear how you made the booklet. Tell me what fact you learned too. Perhaps we can use the new knowledge together in the quiz.|می‌آیم بشنوم دفترچه را چطور ساختی. نکته تازه را هم بگو؛ شاید واقعاً در مسابقه با هم استفاده کنیم.

Waar twijfelt de groep over de richting?|Where does the group become unsure of the direction?|گروه کجا درباره جهت تردید می‌کند؟
Bij de vijver.|At the pond.|کنار برکه.
In het station.|At the station.|در ایستگاه.
Hallo wandelaars, we staan bij de vijver en twijfelen over de route naar het bos. Laten we de kaart vergelijken met wat we zien. We vertrekken pas opnieuw wanneer iedereen begrijpt welke richting we nemen.|Hello walkers, we are at the pond and unsure of the route towards the wood. Let us compare the map with what we can see. We will continue only when everyone understands our direction.|سلام پیاده‌روها، کنار برکه‌ایم و مسیر جنگل روشن نیست. نقشه را با چیزهای دیدنی مقایسه کنیم. وقتی همه جهت را فهمیدند دوباره حرکت می‌کنیم.
Ik kijk mee op de kaart en zoek de vijver en het bos. Daarna herhaal ik de gekozen richting. Als onze uitleg verschilt, verduidelijken we dat voordat we verdergaan.|I will help find the pond and wood on the map. Then I will repeat the chosen direction. If our explanations differ, we will clarify before continuing.|برکه و جنگل را روی نقشه پیدا می‌کنم و جهت انتخابی را تکرار می‌کنم. اگر توضیح‌ها فرق داشت، پیش از ادامه روشن می‌کنیم.

In welke twee maanden fotografeert Ina dezelfde plaats?|In which two months does Ina photograph the same place?|اینا در کدام دو ماه از یک جا عکس می‌گیرد؟
April en juni.|April and June.|آوریل و ژوئن.
Januari en december.|January and December.|ژانویه و دسامبر.
Hoi taalpartner, ik heb in april en juni vanaf dezelfde plaats foto's genomen. Kijk naar de boom, de struik en het groen achter de haag. Kunnen we samen beschrijven wat tussen die twee maanden veranderd is?|Hi language partner, I took photos from the same place in April and June. Look at the tree, bush and greenery behind the hedge. Can we describe what changed between the two months together?|سلام همراه زبانی، در آوریل و ژوئن از یک نقطه عکس گرفتم. درخت، بوته و سبزی پشت پرچین را ببین. با هم تغییر این دو ماه را توضیح بدهیم؟
We leggen de foto's van april en juni naast elkaar. Ik beschrijf eerst wat op beide beelden hetzelfde is en daarna de verschillen. Zo vergelijk ik dezelfde plaats nauwkeurig.|We will put the April and June photos side by side. I will describe similarities first, then differences, to compare the same place carefully.|عکس آوریل و ژوئن را کنار هم می‌گذاریم. اول شباهت و بعد تفاوت را می‌گویم تا همان مکان دقیق مقایسه شود.

Waar ligt de hark terwijl iedereen zoekt?|Where is the rake while everyone searches?|هنگام جست‌وجوی همه شن‌کش کجاست؟
Onder zakken in de kruiwagen.|Under bags in the wheelbarrow.|زیر کیسه‌ها در فرغون.
Naast de gieter op tafel.|Beside the watering can on a table.|کنار آب‌پاش روی میز.
Dag tuingroep, de hark lag onder de zakken in de kruiwagen. Drie mensen zochten tegelijk. We maken nu één zichtbare materiaalhoek. Wil iedereen gebruikt gereedschap daarna op die vaste plaats terugleggen?|Hello gardening group, the rake was under bags in the wheelbarrow. Three people were searching at once. We are making one visible equipment corner. Will everyone return used tools to that fixed place afterwards?|سلام باغبان‌ها، شن‌کش زیر کیسه‌های فرغون بود و سه نفر هم‌زمان دنبالش می‌گشتند. حالا محل مشخص وسایل می‌سازیم. همه بعد از استفاده وسیله را همان‌جا می‌گذارند؟
Ik leg het gereedschap voortaan in de materiaalhoek terug. Voor ik zoek, vraag ik ook of iemand het gebruikt. Een gedeelde vaste plaats voorkomt dubbel zoekwerk.|I will return tools to the equipment corner. Before searching I will also ask whether someone is using them. A shared fixed place prevents duplicate searching.|از این به بعد وسایل را به محل ثابت برمی‌گردانم. قبل از جست‌وجو می‌پرسم کسی استفاده می‌کند یا نه. جای مشترک از جست‌وجوی تکراری جلوگیری می‌کند.

Waarvoor gebruiken de vrijwilligers tijdelijk het opgevangen water?|What do the volunteers temporarily use the collected water for?|داوطلبان موقتاً آب جمع‌شده را برای چه استفاده می‌کنند؟
Voor de kleine planten.|For the small plants.|برای گیاهان کوچک.
Om de kapotte slang te testen.|To test the broken hose.|برای امتحان شلنگ خراب.
Hallo tuinhelpers, de slang lekt en we gebruiken die niet meer. Het probleem is gemeld. In de emmer zit opgevangen water; dat gebruiken we voorlopig voor de kleine planten. Laat de kapotte slang liggen tot ze nagekeken is.|Hello garden helpers, the hose leaks and we are no longer using it. The problem has been reported. There is collected water in the bucket for the small plants for now. Leave the broken hose until it is checked.|سلام کمک‌کنندگان باغ، شلنگ نشتی دارد و دیگر استفاده نمی‌کنیم. مشکل گزارش شده. آب جمع‌شده سطل را فعلاً برای گیاهان کوچک مصرف می‌کنیم. شلنگ را تا بررسی کنار بگذارید.
Ik gebruik voorlopig het water uit de emmer voor de kleine planten. De slang laat ik liggen en ik meld het aan de andere helpers, zodat niemand die opnieuw aansluit.|I will use the bucket water for the small plants for now. I will leave the hose and inform the other helpers so nobody reconnects it.|فعلاً آب سطل را به گیاهان کوچک می‌دهم. شلنگ را کنار می‌گذارم و به بقیه می‌گویم تا کسی دوباره وصل نکند.

Wat ontdekt Omar wanneer hij thuiskomt?|What does Omar discover when he gets home?|عمر وقتی خانه می‌رسد چه می‌فهمد؟
Er liggen nog groenten thuis.|There are still vegetables at home.|هنوز در خانه سبزی هست.
Alle appels zijn op.|All the apples are gone.|همه سیب‌ها تمام شده.
Hoi, Omar hier. Ik heb veel groenten gekocht, maar er lagen thuis nog groenten. Voor we opnieuw winkelen, plan ik maaltijden met wat er al is. Wil je mee de voorraad bekijken en kleinere hoeveelheden op een lijst zetten?|Hi, Omar here. I bought many vegetables but still had vegetables at home. Before shopping again I will plan meals using what we already have. Can you help check supplies and list smaller quantities?|سلام، عمر هستم. سبزی زیاد خریدم ولی در خانه هم بود. پیش از خرید دوباره با موجودی غذا برنامه‌ریزی می‌کنم. موجودی را ببینیم و مقدار کمتر در فهرست بنویسیم؟
We bekijken eerst wat al in huis is en kiezen daar maaltijden bij. Daarna schrijven we alleen op wat ontbreekt. Voor twee personen hoeven we niet zoveel tegelijk te kopen.|We will check what is already at home and plan meals around it. Then we will list only what is missing. Two people do not need so much at once.|اول موجودی خانه را می‌بینیم و غذا مناسبش انتخاب می‌کنیم. بعد فقط کمبود را می‌نویسیم. برای دو نفر خرید خیلی زیاد لازم نیست.

Wat is Yasmin vergeten op de markt?|What did Yasmin forget at the market?|یاسمین چه چیزی را در بازار فراموش کرده؟
Aardbeien voor het dessert.|Strawberries for dessert.|توت‌فرنگی دسر.
Uien voor het hoofdgerecht.|Onions for the main dish.|پیاز غذای اصلی.
Dag gasten, ik ben de aardbeien voor het dessert vergeten. In plaats van opnieuw naar de markt te rijden, vraag ik wat jullie thuis aan fruit hebben. Kan iemand iets meebrengen? Dan passen we het dessert aan.|Hello guests, I forgot the strawberries for dessert. Rather than drive to the market again, I am asking what fruit you have at home. Could someone bring some? Then we will adapt dessert.|سلام مهمان‌ها، توت‌فرنگی دسر را فراموش کردم. به‌جای رفتن دوباره بازار می‌پرسم چه میوه‌ای خانه دارید. کسی چیزی می‌آورد تا دسر را تغییر بدهیم؟
Ik kijk welk fruit ik thuis heb en laat je weten wat ik kan meebrengen. Wacht dus nog even met terugrijden. We kunnen het dessert aan de beschikbare ingrediënten aanpassen.|I will check what fruit I have and tell you what I can bring. Wait before driving back. We can adapt dessert to the available ingredients.|میوه خانه را بررسی و خبر می‌دهم چه می‌آورم. فعلاً برای برگشت صبر کن. دسر را با مواد موجود تغییر می‌دهیم.

Hoe vindt de vrijwilliger uit voor wie elk drankje is?|How does the volunteer find out whom each drink is for?|داوطلب چطور می‌فهمد هر نوشیدنی برای چه کسی است؟
Hij herhaalt de bestelling aan tafel.|He repeats the order at the table.|سفارش را سر میز تکرار می‌کند.
Hij geeft alles willekeurig rond.|He distributes everything randomly.|همه را تصادفی می‌دهد.
Dag tafel, ik heb vijf drankjes op mijn dienblad en weet niet meer wie wat koos. Ik herhaal de bestelling. Wijs je eigen drankje aan voordat ik het neerzet. Dan krijgt iedereen wat hij gevraagd heeft.|Hello table, I have five drinks on my tray and cannot remember who chose what. I will repeat the order. Point to yours before I set it down so everyone gets what they requested.|سلام دوستان میز، پنج نوشیدنی در سینی است و یادم نیست هرکس چه انتخاب کرد. سفارش را تکرار می‌کنم. قبل از گذاشتن، نوشیدنی خود را نشان دهید تا درست برسد.
Goed dat je de bestelling controleert. Ik luister naar de vijf drankjes en wijs aan wat ik besteld heb. Als iets ontbreekt, zeg ik dat rustig voordat je verdergaat.|Good that you are checking the order. I will listen to the five drinks and point to my order. If something is missing, I will say calmly before you continue.|خوب است سفارش را بررسی می‌کنی. پنج نوشیدنی را می‌شنوم و مورد خودم را نشان می‌دهم. اگر چیزی کم است، آرام پیش از ادامه می‌گویم.

Welke koffie had de klant besteld?|Which coffee had the customer ordered?|مشتری چه قهوه‌ای سفارش داده بود؟
Een cafeïnevrije koffie.|A decaffeinated coffee.|قهوه بدون کافئین.
Een gewone koffie.|A regular coffee.|قهوه معمولی.
Excuseer, ik had een cafeïnevrije koffie besteld, maar volgens mij staat hier een gewone koffie. Kunt u het bestelbriefje controleren? Ik wil eerst zeker weten welke koffie dit is voordat ik ervan drink.|Excuse me, I ordered decaffeinated coffee but think this is regular coffee. Could you check the order slip? I want to know which it is before drinking.|ببخشید، قهوه بدون کافئین سفارش دادم ولی فکر می‌کنم این معمولی است. برگه سفارش را بررسی می‌کنید؟ پیش از نوشیدن می‌خواهم مطمئن شوم کدام است.
Ik controleer het bestelbriefje en vraag na welke koffie u gekregen hebt. Als het de verkeerde is, zorg ik voor de juiste bestelling. Bedankt dat u het rustig meldt.|I will check the order slip and ask which coffee you received. If it is wrong, I will arrange the correct order. Thank you for reporting it calmly.|برگه را بررسی و نوع قهوه را می‌پرسم. اگر اشتباه است، سفارش درست را می‌آورم. ممنون که آرام گفتید.

Wanneer kiest Hana haar gerecht?|When does Hana choose her dish?|هانا چه زمانی غذایش را انتخاب می‌کند؟
Nadat ze voldoende informatie over de saus heeft.|After she has enough information about the sauce.|پس از داشتن اطلاعات کافی درباره سس.
Voordat iemand de ingrediënten nakijkt.|Before anyone checks the ingredients.|پیش از بررسی مواد.
Goedendag, bij deze saus vind ik de ingrediënten en allergenen niet duidelijk terug op de kaart. Wilt u dat in de keuken navragen? Ik kies pas als ik de informatie heb. Gok alstublieft niet als u het niet weet.|Hello, I cannot clearly find this sauce's ingredients and allergens on the menu. Could you check in the kitchen? I will choose after getting the information. Please do not guess if you do not know.|سلام، مواد و حساسیت‌زاهای سس در منو روشن نیست. از آشپزخانه می‌پرسید؟ بعد از اطلاعات انتخاب می‌کنم. لطفاً اگر نمی‌دانید حدس نزنید.
Ik vraag de ingrediënten en allergenen in de keuken na en kom met de beschikbare informatie terug. U kunt daarna kiezen. Wat ik niet kan bevestigen, zal ik duidelijk zeggen.|I will ask the kitchen about ingredients and allergens and return with the available information. You can choose afterwards. I will clearly say what I cannot confirm.|مواد و حساسیت‌زاها را از آشپزخانه می‌پرسم و با اطلاعات برمی‌گردم. بعد انتخاب کنید. هرچه نتوانم تأیید کنم، روشن می‌گویم.

Waarom vraagt het gezin naar de wachttijd?|Why does the family ask about waiting time?|چرا خانواده زمان انتظار را می‌پرسد؟
Hun trein vertrekt vroeg.|Their train leaves early.|قطارشان زود حرکت می‌کند.
Ze willen de hele namiddag blijven.|They want to stay all afternoon.|می‌خواهند تمام بعدازظهر بمانند.
Goedendag, onze trein vertrekt vroeg en we hebben maar een uur. Welke gerechten zijn snel klaar? We willen ook weten hoe we kunnen betalen. Kunt u de wachttijd eerlijk aangeven, zodat we op tijd onze rekening kunnen vragen?|Hello, our train leaves early and we only have an hour. Which dishes are quick? We also want to know how to pay. Could you give an honest waiting time so we can ask for the bill in time?|سلام، قطارمان زود حرکت می‌کند و فقط یک ساعت داریم. کدام غذا زود آماده است و چطور پرداخت کنیم؟ زمان انتظار را دقیق بگویید تا صورت‌حساب را به‌موقع بخواهیم.
Ik vraag de keuken welke gerechten snel klaar zijn en geef de wachttijd door. Daarna kunt u kiezen of dat binnen uw uur past. Ik leg ook de betaalmogelijkheden uit.|I will ask the kitchen which dishes are quick and give you the waiting time. Then you can decide whether it fits your hour. I will explain payment options too.|از آشپزخانه غذای سریع و زمان انتظار را می‌پرسم. بعد تصمیم بگیرید در یک ساعت جا می‌شود یا نه. روش پرداخت را هم توضیح می‌دهم.

Wat vergelijkt An behalve de prijs van de waterkokers?|What does An compare besides the kettles' prices?|آن علاوه بر قیمت کتری‌ها چه مقایسه می‌کند؟
Kwaliteit, levensduur, garantie en herkomst.|Quality, lifespan, warranty and origin.|کیفیت، عمر، ضمانت و محل ساخت.
Alleen de kleur van de verpakking.|Only the packaging colour.|فقط رنگ بسته‌بندی.
Goedendag, deze twee waterkokers verschillen sterk in prijs. Kunt u uitleg geven over de kwaliteit, levensduur, garantie en herkomst? Niet alles staat op de doos. Zeg gerust welke informatie niet beschikbaar is.|Hello, these two kettles differ greatly in price. Could you explain their quality, lifespan, warranty and origin? Not everything is on the box. Please say which information is unavailable.|سلام، قیمت این دو کتری خیلی فرق دارد. درباره کیفیت، عمر، ضمانت و محل ساخت توضیح می‌دهید؟ همه‌چیز روی جعبه نیست. اطلاعات ناموجود را هم بگویید.
Ik vergelijk de beschikbare productinformatie met u. Wat niet op de doos staat, zoek ik na. Ik maak duidelijk onderscheid tussen bevestigde gegevens en eigenschappen waarover we geen informatie hebben.|I will compare the available product information with you and look up what is missing. I will distinguish confirmed details from properties we have no information about.|اطلاعات موجود را با شما مقایسه و کمبود را جست‌وجو می‌کنم. داده تأییدشده را از ویژگی نامعلوم جدا می‌کنم.

Wat controleert Faris voordat hij een lunchdoos kiest?|What does Faris check before choosing a lunch box?|فارس پیش از انتخاب ظرف غذا چه بررسی می‌کند؟
Of de doos in zijn tas past.|Whether the box fits in his bag.|آیا ظرف در کیفش جا می‌شود.
Of de kleur precies bij de winkel past.|Whether the colour matches the shop.|آیا رنگ با فروشگاه جور است.
Hoi Faris, die lunchdoos ziet er mooi uit, maar controleer ook het gewicht en of ze in je tas past. Het etiket over houdbaarheid gaat over het eten erin. Kun je het kleinere model naast dit model leggen?|Hi Faris, that lunch box looks good, but check the weight and whether it fits your bag. The shelf-life label refers to the food inside. Can you put the smaller model beside it?|سلام فارس، ظرف زیباست ولی وزن و جا شدن در کیف را بررسی کن. تاریخ ماندگاری مربوط به غذای داخل است. مدل کوچک‌تر را کنارش می‌گذاری؟
Ik vergelijk de twee formaten en probeer het kleinere model in mijn tas. Voor dagelijks gebruik zijn gewicht en pasvorm belangrijk. De houdbaarheidsdatum verwar ik niet met de levensduur van de doos.|I will compare both sizes and try the smaller model in my bag. Weight and fit matter for daily use. I will not confuse food expiry with the box's lifespan.|دو اندازه را مقایسه و مدل کوچک را در کیف امتحان می‌کنم. وزن و اندازه برای هرروز مهم‌اند. تاریخ غذا را با عمر ظرف اشتباه نمی‌گیرم.

Wat noteert Noor bij uitspraken in de media?|What does Noor note beside statements in the media?|نور کنار گفته‌های رسانه چه یادداشت می‌کند؟
Wie iets zegt en welk bewijs erbij staat.|Who says it and what evidence accompanies it.|گوینده و شواهد همراه.
Alleen hoeveel mensen het bericht leuk vinden.|Only how many people like it.|فقط تعداد پسندها.
Hallo leesgroep, noteer bij elke uitspraak wie ze doet en welk bewijs genoemd wordt. Een persoonlijke ervaring geldt niet vanzelf voor iedereen. Kies één zin uit het artikel en leg uit of die een ervaring, mening of onderbouwde uitspraak beschrijft.|Hello reading group, note who makes each statement and what evidence is mentioned. One person's experience does not automatically apply to everyone. Choose one sentence and explain whether it describes an experience, opinion or supported claim.|سلام گروه مطالعه، گوینده هر جمله و شواهدش را بنویسید. تجربه یک نفر خودبه‌خود برای همه نیست. یک جمله انتخاب و بگویید تجربه، نظر یا ادعای مستند است.
Ik kies één uitspraak en zoek eerst de spreker. Daarna kijk ik welk bewijs erbij staat. Ik leg uit waarom die uitspraak wel of niet over meer mensen kan gaan.|I will choose a statement and identify its speaker first. Then I will check the evidence and explain whether it can apply to more people.|یک گفته انتخاب می‌کنم و اول گوینده را پیدا می‌کنم. بعد شواهد را می‌بینم و توضیح می‌دهم آیا می‌تواند درباره افراد بیشتری باشد.

Wat ontdekt Lars bij de oorspronkelijke publicatie?|What does Lars discover in the original publication?|لارس در انتشار اصلی چه می‌فهمد؟
De aangekondigde activiteit is al voorbij.|The advertised event has already happened.|فعالیت اعلام‌شده گذشته است.
De activiteit begint pas volgend jaar.|The event starts next year.|فعالیت سال بعد شروع می‌شود.
Dag buurtchat, ik heb de oorspronkelijke publicatie van de aankondiging bekeken. De datum is oud en de activiteit is al voorbij. Deel het bericht dus niet als een nieuwe uitnodiging. Ik wilde dat even vriendelijk rechtzetten.|Hello neighbourhood chat, I checked the announcement's original publication. The date is old and the event is over. Please do not share it as a new invitation. I wanted to correct that politely.|سلام گروه محله، انتشار اصلی اعلان را دیدم. تاریخ قدیمی است و برنامه گذشته. آن را دعوت تازه منتشر نکنید؛ خواستم دوستانه اصلاح کنم.
Bedankt om de datum te controleren. Ik deel het bericht niet verder als nieuwe activiteit. Volgende keer kijk ik eerst naar de oorspronkelijke publicatie voordat ik het doorstuur.|Thanks for checking the date. I will not share it as a new event. Next time I will check the original publication before forwarding.|ممنون که تاریخ را بررسی کردی. به‌عنوان برنامه تازه پخش نمی‌کنم. دفعه بعد پیش از فرستادن، انتشار اصلی را می‌بینم.

Wat dachten sommige deelnemers ten onrechte over de inschrijving?|What did some participants wrongly assume about registration?|بعضی شرکت‌کنندگان درباره ثبت‌نام چه فرض اشتباهی داشتند؟
Dat vervoer inbegrepen was.|That transport was included.|اینکه رفت‌وآمد شامل آن است.
Dat er helemaal geen zaal was.|That there was no hall at all.|اینکه اصلاً سالن نیست.
Beste deelnemers, inschrijven voor de activiteit betekent niet dat vervoer inbegrepen is. Zaal en catering zijn geregeld. Wie samen wil reizen, kan met andere deelnemers afspreken. Laat weten als hierover nog onduidelijkheid is.|Dear participants, registering for the activity does not include transport. The hall and catering are arranged. Anyone wanting to travel together can arrange it with other participants. Say if anything remains unclear.|شرکت‌کنندگان عزیز، ثبت‌نام رفت‌وآمد را شامل نمی‌شود. سالن و پذیرایی آماده است. برای سفر مشترک با دیگران هماهنگ کنید. اگر مبهم است بگویید.
Ik begrijp nu dat ik mijn vervoer zelf moet regelen. Ik vraag andere deelnemers of we samen kunnen reizen. Kunt u nog doorgeven waar en wanneer we verwacht worden?|I now understand I must arrange transport myself. I will ask others about travelling together. Could you confirm where and when we are expected?|حالا فهمیدم رفت‌وآمد را خودم هماهنگ کنم. از بقیه درباره همراهی می‌پرسم. می‌گویید کی و کجا باید باشیم؟

Hoe controleert de vrijwilliger de bewegwijzering?|How does the volunteer check the signs?|داوطلب تابلوهای راهنما را چطور بررسی می‌کند؟
Hij loopt de route alsof hij voor het eerst komt.|He walks the route as a first-time visitor.|مثل بازدیدکننده باراول مسیر را می‌رود.
Hij bekijkt alleen de geluidsinstallatie.|He only checks the sound system.|فقط دستگاه صدا را بررسی می‌کند.
Dag vrijwilliger, bezoekers lopen verkeerd ondanks het duidelijke programma. Loop de route eens alsof je hier voor het eerst bent. Kijk vooral naar het bord bij de deur. Meld welke aanduiding mensen naar de verkeerde zaal stuurt.|Hello volunteer, visitors go the wrong way despite the clear programme. Walk the route as if visiting for the first time. Check the sign by the door especially. Report which sign sends people to the wrong hall.|سلام داوطلب، با وجود برنامه روشن، مردم اشتباه می‌روند. مثل باراول مسیر را برو و به تابلوی در دقت کن. بگو کدام علامت به سالن اشتباه می‌فرستد.
Ik volg de route vanaf de ingang zonder voorkennis. Daarna wijs ik het verkeerde bord aan en stel een betere plaats voor. Vervolgens controleer ik of een bezoeker zonder hulp de zaal vindt.|I will follow the route from the entrance without prior knowledge. Then I will identify the wrong sign and suggest a better position, and check whether a visitor finds the hall unaided.|از ورودی بدون آشنایی قبلی مسیر را می‌روم. تابلوی اشتباه و جای بهتر را مشخص می‌کنم؛ بعد می‌بینم بازدیدکننده بی‌کمک سالن را پیدا می‌کند یا نه.

Welke fout maakt Dina in haar vraagzin?|What mistake does Dina make in her question?|دینا در سؤال چه اشتباهی می‌کند؟
Een verkeerde werkwoordsvorm.|An incorrect verb form.|شکل اشتباه فعل.
Een verkeerd adres van de zaal.|An incorrect hall address.|نشانی اشتباه سالن.
Hoi Dina, in je vraagzin staat een verkeerde werkwoordsvorm. Laten we nu alleen dat punt verbeteren. Gebruik de vraag daarna opnieuw met andere woorden. Zo oefenen we de vorm, niet alleen één zin die je uit het hoofd kent.|Hi Dina, your question has an incorrect verb form. Let us correct just that point now. Then use the question with different words. We are practising the form, not only a memorised sentence.|سلام دینا، شکل فعل سؤالت اشتباه است. الان فقط همان را درست کنیم؛ بعد سؤال را با واژه دیگر به کار ببر. شکل را تمرین می‌کنیم، نه فقط یک جمله حفظی.
Ik verbeter eerst de werkwoordsvorm en zeg de vraag opnieuw. Daarna maak ik een nieuwe vraag met dezelfde vorm. Kun je controleren of ik die nu ook zelfstandig gebruik?|I will correct the verb form and repeat the question. Then I will make a new question using the same form. Can you check whether I use it independently now?|اول شکل فعل را درست و سؤال را تکرار می‌کنم. بعد سؤال تازه با همان شکل می‌سازم. بررسی می‌کنی حالا مستقل استفاده می‌کنم یا نه؟

Wat wil Tom met zijn neutralere vraag bereiken?|What does Tom want to achieve with his more neutral question?|تام با سؤال خنثی‌تر چه می‌خواهد؟
De afspraak controleren zonder iemand te beschuldigen.|Check the agreement without accusing anyone.|بررسی توافق بدون متهم کردن کسی.
De ander met nadruk verwijten maken.|Strongly reproach the other person.|سرزنش شدید طرف مقابل.
Hoi Tom, door de klemtoon klonk je vraag verwijtend. Je wilt eigenlijk onze afspraak controleren. Probeer: Kunt u onze afspraak even herhalen? Luister daarna naar beide opnames en vergelijk de toon, niet alleen de woorden.|Hi Tom, the stress made your question sound accusatory. You actually want to check our agreement. Try: Could you repeat our agreement? Then listen to both recordings and compare the tone, not only the words.|سلام تام، تکیه سؤالت را سرزنش‌آمیز کرد. در واقع می‌خواهی توافق را بررسی کنی. بگو: توافقمان را تکرار می‌کنید؟ بعد هر دو ضبط را بشنو و لحن را هم مقایسه کن.
Ik wil de afspraak controleren, niet iemand beschuldigen. Daarom probeer ik de neutralere vraag en luister ik terug naar mijn klemtoon. Daarna vergelijk ik beide versies met mijn oefenpartner.|I want to check the agreement, not accuse anyone. I will try the neutral question and listen to my stress. Then I will compare both versions with my partner.|می‌خواهم توافق را بررسی کنم، نه کسی را متهم کنم. سؤال خنثی را می‌گویم و تکیه را می‌شنوم. بعد دو نسخه را با همراهم مقایسه می‌کنم.
